Love both of those shows so much! Psych is hilarious. Person of Interest is excellent.  
I feel like if there is even a remote chance of this happening, the vive should also be attached by a separate cable to your waist/shoulder, whatever. 
This looks really cool, I love the little details - especially the glowing eyes of the creature hiding in his leg!
Definitely the Packers.  Without Tolzien, they're pretty screwed
You just gotta follow the teachings of Albert Camus and become an absurd hero, not joking
I calculated my macros at the beginning and they seemed reasonable. I'll aim to limit my daily intake to 1000kcal a day from now on.
Thanks for doing this
Fair enough, I apologize.
I think James Rodriguez would be up for a move.
And you cannnn put it on the boaaaaaaard. Yes!
Doesn't need a theme, it's Overwatch.
As a rule of thumb, upgrade weapons before armour.  Unless you need the extra defence, there isn't much benefit to upgrading armour. There's a 1% increase in DPS when you go up a tier. (Bandos » Nex/Nex » Malevolent) However, there is a noticeable increase in maintenance costs. If you still feel like upgrading armour, the Anima Core sets are the best non-degradable armour, which make them ideal for slayer.  Aside from the higher damage, the difference between Drygores and Dragon Rider Lance is that the lance is treated as a halberd. Halberds have an extra tile of reach and work better with AoE abilities. A halberd would have a 5x5 AoE on Hurricane/Quake abilities rather than 3x3. This makes it superior in AoE slayer situations, assuming you're not just using ranged or magic.  Chaotic weapons are great starter weapons, as they are (nearly) free, and easily maintained by doing Sinkholes. You already have a chaotic staff, and Royal crossbow would be a good alternative if you don't want to get another chaotic.  The GWD2 weapons (t85) are decent weapons and will serve you well until you can upgrade to better equipment. They're slightly better than chaotics—though they have the same damage, they have much higher accuracy. The Dragon Rider Lance has accuracy equal to Drygores. GWD2 weapons are cheap compared to t90s (best of the best equipment).   * Dragon Rider Lance/Blade of Avaryss/Nymora » Drygores/Noxious Scythe  * Shadow Glaives » Ascension crossbows/Noxious Longbow  * Wand of the Cywir Elders » Seismics/Noxious staff  Try to minimize your use of degradables such as Nex boots/gloves, as they increase your maintenance costs while providing minimal bonuses.
It was an awesome ride. Giro di Paso century in Paso Robles. It was my first century, and my longest ride by far (two longest rides before this were 50 and 70 miles). It wasn't as hard as I expected!  I went with several friends, but most of them ended up doing the metric route instead, but two of my buddies decided to stick with the imperial. It was a hilly course (~8500 ft), but fairly spread out with only one sustained climb. I was pretty nervous about all the climbing so most of my training rides included hills. I'm glad I did this because it paid off! There was a KOM challenge on Old Creek Rd (3 mi, 6%) about halfway through our ride and I placed 10th out of the 39 men that registered. That was the only real tough part of the ride, the rest of it was mostly rolling hills with beautiful scenery all along the way.  The one eventful part of this all was that in the excitement at the start, we missed our first turn-off for the imperial route and ended up on the metric route! We didn't realize this until we got the first rest stop which seemed to come up way faster than we expected. Ended up not being a big deal - the metric and imperial courses overlapped for the most part from that point on, so we just continued along the planned imperial route as if we hadn't missed anything. When we got the finish we'd only done 70 miles, so we improvised a loop that added another 30 miles to get our 100 under our belt. This was also a first century for one of my riding buddies, so we didn't want to go home until our Garmins had 3 digits for mileage. Unfortunately for me, my battery died right around mile 90. It'd be nice to have the record of the full ride on my Strava, but oh well! It was a great experience, and we had a lot of fun. Legs are just a bit sore from the ride two days ago, but otherwise I feel great and accomplished.  Anyhow I'm not sure what the point of this post was other than somewhere for me to share my experience. But if you're looking for a nice, scenic century along the CA coast, you should be sure to check this one out! It is a really small event (~100 riders combined) so you never feel crowded. Support and food at the rest stops was good, but as I learned the hard way, the route markers left a little to be desired ;)  Good luck to all those who are on their way to training for their first century!
And a tennis ball. And string.
Beautiful
[please see this similar post that was posted 10 minutes before yours](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskWomen/comments/4ly2xp/is_there_a_such_thing_as_a_girls_girl/)
I just happened to be in the wrong place at the wrong time. No gun turned up. No one in the park had drugs. They just ran up on a group of 10 people and searched everyone. ONE guy had a work knife that he kept on a cord around his neck. They couldn't charge anyone with anything.
Great! I hope you will be interesting for the kids, and not a nightmare :P, what do you teach?
#I NEED ONE NOW
I'm very glad I read that. The first well thought out piece of journalism on the issue I have come across yet.
IGN: Yozer  Slot: Any AAR
They can send Expeditionary Forces though?
me too thanks
for some reason, was not expecting the pilot sleeping area... 
^ this. I came here to say exactly this. No reason to take that many hits this round with so many teams on bye. 
FeelsBadMan
To be fair we were helped by the ball rolling over Artur Boruc's foot for what proved to be the winner in our 3-2 win at home.
We bought Alaska to mark our intentions. Now that Canada has become complacent, it's time to follow through...
The second or third line where you basically sounded like a snark asshole when you said "no you don't get it." Is where I stopped reading.  You patronize people for their opinions or comments, don't expect them to read your essays you leave as you attempt to condescend and be a knob to them some more.
The only one being a massive cunt here is you, dickhead. Take this L 
ok dis hard
Who is dankey kang!
for sure:P
What system are you playing on?  
Ok I'll try that
If they were a reputable legal service that examined all evidence fairly and in a measured fashion sure. But the idea of socialists using free market legal services to resolve their problems in a free market society is a strange one.
idk what to do honestly.. someone call timbo we need a little chit chat
Try to flush your mind of what you think you know. Something got bent, you have to find that and un-bend it.   Good luck.  
ARE YOU HAPPY NOW JAMES WEEKS?
When I played ranked last year everyone called support. As a support main I made it to Gold V from playing mid and top. I almost never get support. 
How do I access that?
If I could do the math in front of you I would.  Being a predator/carnivor is an immensly important step in being sentient. We would have to (not exact but ratio's would be close) eat 20 or 30 pounds of the grass a lamb eats, given we could digest it, to a few pounds of the meat off said lamb to gain the same energy.  On top of the shear amount of time we save not eating and the amount of energy we are able to consume from smaller portions, we are able to gain more nutrients that animal already spent time to gain from other places we would also have to search for.  Us starting to eat meat wasn't a taste or eating style, it's one of the bigger reasons we are able to do the things we do.  Now, granted I've said that, I'm going to counter point myself by saying we have definitely evolved to the point we could create easy to produce and non wasteful sources of energy through genetically modifying (or engineering if you wanna be all technical) our current plant foods. And if your against GMO's and wanna eat vegetarian or vegan or whatever go ahead, power to ya. But your not going as far as me and my higher energy food friends.
[And don't you bury me six feet under ground, Just burn my body in a box. And let my ashes blow with the wind, Out into the night sky.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=BsboDFvFlZI)  Sorry, just reminded me of this song.
Isn't the same true of the waif? If so, why has the waif always seemed to have it out for Arya?
This is the one I got, and it's probably my least favorite out of all the variants.
I played Injustice competitively, I will register for every tournament with the name WhyGuggenheim if she's Black Canary in Injustice2
*She shrugs, thinking about what might be the most interesting.*   "How about the shopping district." 
so this has been bugging me for a while... why the fuck do protoss women have boobs? do they have mamary glands in those boobs to feed their young? 
No emails today. Sadly!!
Loney's gotten some good contact so far. hasn't gotten the hit, but looks good imo.
Ok lets see some runs Zu.
shout out /u/vincebarter: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=e7g5JADcrSo   (uncensored version)
The Mass Effect trilogy
Upper lip and chin almost in unison.
There's no way that's gonna run it on ultra/epic settings.  It'll be interesting if it can run it at all.
I feel like Chell is not so good, at least the hero power could use some work. My first thought would be "Long Fall Boots: Restore yourself to full health". This way you won't get that big of a disadvantage of setting your health to 12 and spending your whole turn doing it, unless your opponent can burst you down for 12.
Pretty.
Yep, TIMF Saturdays have always been the electronic days and the Sundays are more of the indie rock days. Makes for a much chiller vibe on Sunday, compared to the more hyped vibe on Saturday
or an authenticator
Was there any in the first place, though?   Two better alternatives exist in the first four worlds.   Heck, Pea-nut is better than it.
Rest in nibbles here's a hug in case u need one *hug*
Im pretty sure that was my first ever cpu purchase when i was building my first pc back in 2010. Great little cpu
777  Trips
I watched it with my older brother when I was about ten so had no idea. I recently rewatched it all on Netflix and sat there thinking, did I actually understand any of these jokes?
So you are getting 10k off a car and you think they will be fine dropping another 2k off? Why do you think they should give you 12k off?
Definitely dealing with a similar thing with my 13 month old. She's very sweet and friendly, but barks when encountering people. The hair on her back also stands up. I really would like to fix this so any help is greatly appreciated!
Why did everyone kill Chet?
yeah breast cancer fucked up pink for me
There are many good reasons to use Virtualisation, and I'm probably going to miss plenty.  1. You can have multiple VMs with DIFFERENT operating systems. This is impossible on the same physical host if you want to run Windows, Linux, BSD and others at the same time. 2. You can have more granular control over OS and software versioning compared to having it bare metal. You can have Windows 2008, 2012 R2 and 2016 all on the same box, in VMs. 3. You can do backups of entire VMs. This means you can rapidly restore if you fucked up. In almost all cases this works very well, but there are some where it doesn't. 4. You can live migrate between hosts. Again, something impossible to do on bare metal. In a cluster, you could migrate all the VMs on a node off the node, update the node, reboot it, bring it back online, and then move the VMs back onto it. All without the VMs noticing anything changed. 5. You can drastically reduce the cross-exploitation of breaches in systems. You aren't 100% protected by this, as there are ways to escalate out of VMs, but it's fucking hard to do. If a VM gets breached, it's very probable the breach won't inherently spread to other VMs just because they're on the same host. However if you ran all your shit on one bare metal system, the whole thing could be compromised. 6. You can leverage RAM sharing through KSM and other technologies, to "oversubscribe" how much you have running on the same hardware. Something generally not possible with bare metal implementations. 7. VMs typically start/stop/operate faster than bare metal, as they have a far more streamlined hardware set to deal with (think ACPI, etc). I can restart a VM inside 5-10s, that includes shutting down complex services, booting, etc. Far faster than bare metal. 8. You can template/clone VMs for rapid scalability. If you need to run lots of the same thing, you can spin up lots of VMs from a template you make. This can be a very efficient way of expanding your services to more clients.  That's about it for now. I'm sure there's more.
Dead battery?
5-10% of the bill. They still have to clean up after you and most places I go to the wait staff still get my drinks.
Jessy Terrero directed Soul Plane.  I don't know what Soul Plan is.
It's awful. I don't know how much more isk I can make. 
yeah coc didnt work how i thought it would, gunna run some stupid comk setup to make the build more interesting for sure
You're not making sense.  Outside the wire for 3 years is hardly comparable to 3 trips to the range.  Also, not going off or whatever the fuck you said. Don't add false context to my question, ms couric.  Finally, I'm all about knowing why someone would spend 3k on a watch for practical purposes. It's why I asked, ya know, the question.
Reds-related but not game related, finally finished my home office, set up my [Reds collection.](https://i.imgur.com/ausDCDzl.jpg)
0/3 midlaner says "I dont need a silver to ward for me"  I was gold last season but hadn't played much ranked and we had the same ranked mmr. 
exactly, they never said he didn't!
Amd knows at this point that Nvidia won't have cheap enough cards at the power needed to suit Apple's needs, so it seems Apple needs AMD more than AMD needs Apple... AMD would hopefully be smart enough to not want to piss off their customers with another 285 fiasco, especially when they are trying to bring in new customers
Also, not so good players can throw matches and leads easily as they lack game knowledge, game sense, etc. When matching pro players vs pro players, then the difference comes to team cohesion and team fighting skills.
rare footage of noel not mouth breathing 
What do libertarians on this sub think of Johnson getting more media coverage all of a sudden? I see it as a good sign, but unfortunately not enough to win.
Personally I didn't see the problem with Season 1's matchmaking. What should have happened was that the highest level matches in lower divisions should award pips to both teams - that way, the game acknowledges that the players don't belong in the lower division and works quickly to advance them out of the lower tiers.   So with S1's 50% win rate matchmaking, start players at higher divisions based off of last division, and have the top tier players play each other in T3 and simultaneously gain pips. Let's say, at T3 the top 25% of matches, all players gain pips (winner gains 2, loser gains 1, then add winstreak bonus), at T4 the top 10% of matches gain pips, then at T5 it goes back to pure 50% win rate so the top diamond players slowly filter into legendary. This removes the incentive to tank initial rating and then stomp scrubs into T6, since it would simply be faster to be a top tier player and advance quickly on 3pips/game.  This gets the good players into T5 quickly so they can duke it out for an early season T6, and preserves the 50% win rate so games are reasonably fair.
That's a fantastic idea!
C'est une affirmation assez générale et je ne sais pas si elle représente bien ce que "les sociologues" pensent (si on fait l'hypothèse que l'ensemble des sociologues pensent la même chose).   De tête, je n'arrive pas vraiment à trouver le nom d'un sociologue qui affirme catégoriquement que "mixer des gens très différents (...) est une bonne idée". En général, leurs conclusions sur le sujet sont quand même assez nuancées (d'ailleurs l'expression "mixité sociale" est très critiquée en sociologie). J'ai plus d'exemples d'études qui concluent plus ou moins l'inverse qui me viennent en tête. Mais si vous en connaissez je suis vraiment intéressé !
Lol so many plays of the game are just someone shooting Pharah out of the sky as she uses her ult. Technically it counts as a shutdown, but it's like... yeah, that was more me making a bad decision to use the rocket barrage there than any other factor.
supa jelly. would swap my m3 for one in a heartbeat if i wasn't worried about the maintenance cost increasing. how often do you drive it, and what problems have you had, if any?
Oh I comprehend. If you do not show opposition, which you state, you are condoning it. There is no gray line, nor is there a fence you can sit on.  Your basic explanation of what a man is what my three year old boy would use as a definition. A man is not only determined by how he acts with concern to his wife but how he acts in every day life. If you think that people do not judge a man by the way he acts, then again, you have not reached a point where you understand what a man is.
Depression doesn't end, but we don't have to let it win. Please stay strong. 
Elephants are also known to trample their young when born in captivity 
I've always wondered this...  Can a non-Catholic go to confession? It always seemed like such an interesting and valuable practice.
This may apply to some of the major metropolitan areas, but the country as a whole is not full. In fact, we are below replacement rate in terms of births. We need immigration. 
Я в польше сегодня четыре days'm рядом с рецидива. sorry about my russian
I never said there was an issue. Just that it would equalize better if only one equalette was used. 
####**Fanart Corner:** Post your favorite anime related fanart!  ---  Artwork I wanted to share:  [**Little Yato (Noragami)**](http://i.imgur.com/Tz4Sioy.png)  - [Sauce](http://www.pixiv.net/member_illust.php?mode=medium&amp;illust_id=55349558) 
Arya's next scene might clarify that
No! Derpy is best pony.   And she's grey. And her two eyes do different things.  Now if only you could actually buy one in a store...
Contrary to popular belief, its legal to pass cars on the right in most states
Je nach Location kann man da nicht klagen.   Als Praktikant verdient man hier schon mehr als die meisten Senior Software Engineers in Deutschland, das Einstiegsgehalt liegt je nach Firma über deinem mittelfristigen Ziel, Aktien und Bonus noch nicht eingerechnet. Irgendwie müssen die ganzen Porsche &amp; Teslas die hier rumfahren ja auch bezahlt werden.
Funny enough, Woodrow Wilson himself said "If you want to make enemies, try and change something."
That's why I play Sion. One of the most rewarding champs when you get good enough at timing and spacing his q and using his other abilities to their full effectiveness
So you won't continue when new episodes come out?
[Same thing happened to me with a razor blade](https://m.imgur.com/a/9WJrv)
Ser Mace Morrigen (Driver)   Ser Artys Trant (Archer)
Yeah, probably, if not, then ask again.
I am in a mechanical engineering program. There are 128 credit hours in classes that are assigned as requirements. Some of these are communications, accounting, and other courses which are somewhat tangential, but most involve highly technical aims (Thermodynamics, Vibrations, Heat Transfer, Kinetics of Machinery, etc).  All of this is stuff I am extremely interested in, but I often find my classmates lacking a broader context for their knowledge, and the rigors of the program make extracurricular learning difficult. 
Your partner's an idiot.  Where was he raised?
Eh, once you start adding qualifiers instead of being able to say "never, ever worked", it just doesn't have the same ring to it. I'm sure pure socialism doesn't work well, but does pure capitalism? What if the police force, the courts and the armed forces were all completely privatised? And even if it would be Bernie's wet dream, he would only be able to shift America a smidge towards socialism in his term - Bernie in office doesn't mean you'll be in a bread line in four years.   As for the American population argument... Very few countries do come close, so I don't see why it really has any relevance. India and China are pretty close in population, while India is capitalist and appears an even worse place to live than China. Small data sets mean you take the examples you can get, without making certain predictions from them. 
Every spoken language 
Because everything is cheaper here. Not because there was dollar parity. 
Lemme guess, Florida?
You did a great job dude. No joke. Keep this stuff coming if it behooves you :D  We use W in my league but I would consider using Duffy as a streamer if the matchup is right. I'm pretty stringy about my streamers.
Smoked 2C-B, or 5-MeO-MiPT
Look at the casters and community. The entire game is a b side. I wish it was more popular but it doesn't appear likely any more. 
Okay, so you backslid a little and upvoted. That's okay. You see, we believe it's important to forgive yourself. There is a higher power that can help you if you just ask. Have you ever tried praying to a Mod?
CUT MY LIFE INTO PIECES
So apparently the true problem with the whole refugee crisis is that many of them are single males that are only coming through Europe to fuck European women and get easy government benefits. If it was only married men, woman, and children (families), then this wouldn't have been such a big issue.   Obviously if the flow of Muslim migrants continues, we are going to see serious issues, but as of right now the main problem is single men being disgusting, raping leeches. 
... Habbo Hotel?
So you did!
Beautiful!
IGN: Gordo Weedman  Slot: Able AAR
I'd say Dark Souls is somewhat harder because it's much longer, for one thing. If you took a day and focused on finding the rhythm and all the "tricks" for the first Castlevania game you can master it relatively quick.   I played the first Castlevania so much as a kid that it got burned into my memory how to beat the game. If I picked it up again today I could probably beat it within two hours. But if you've never played it like I said it's just trial and error and finding the pattern to beat each level. 
Wow, doing great!! Keep it up!! 
http://imgur.com/RjVdDeQ
Hmmm, thats a tough one. On one hand, the first squad is very good and balanced, the second one is more focused on one player. Id personally go with 2 just because Griezmann is a fucking beast.   But its all on you. Do you want one really amazing player and a solid squad, or a really good squad thats balanced all around?
I meant as in erotic literature in general not to mention teachings from others.  People have been fucking for thousands of years, they haven't just figured it out in the last hundred years, say what you want about the puritans they believed that orgasms where important as part of conception(a common belief at the time) for example.
Or alternatively, if you play in "fullscreen" mode in OW you can just manually set the resolution to 1080p or 1440p and it will do the exact same thing and stretch it.. Looks awful though. But it might be easier with this method for some. 
And Jamaal Charles
My second ex apparently was into me for SIX MONTHS before I noticed. I mentioned it to a mutual female friend, and she said "oh yeah, of course she is."
The end user not getting their way.
That's because situations where gender roles are reversed don't make it to the front page.
Now remove the two hero shackleshot bullshit.
Jesus Christ. What a bunch of morons. Because apparently men are mind readers who should know if you really want it or not.
I think the problem with starting with 'quo facto' is that it doesn't link to anything prior to this paragraph. So here I think 'then' needs to be temporal. deinde, tum, something like that.  Your spelling on commemmoraverimus seems to have got stuck on the letter 'm'. few other typos as well.  pulchritudinis probably does need to go into the ablative.  incoluerunt - I think the NH key has taught me to be more flexible and use an imperfect here.  removere - is okay, but not the best verb choice I would think.   cinctus est - because I think this is an adjectival phrase, rather than a perfect passive, I would switch to erat.  habuit - if you want to use this verb here, again I think imperfect would be better. same with custodivit.   portam, not portum!
I had a hamburger there that was really quite good. Overpriced but good
Gosh this sucks
A lot of King's Cross. Most importantly Dumbledore saying how stupid Voldemort was. In the movie they didn't even explain how Harry lived through the blood in Voldemort!!
[It doesn't have to.](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/1001_Albums_You_Must_Hear_Before_You_Die) I'm up to 1974.
Have you checked that your IP is allowed on the hosts firewall? 
Any chance of this actually happening, some or all of it? And are they so overcome with hatred of feminism that they are mostly planning their world around ruling women, or is this noble?  Also, I can easily imagine living like this. Even to the point of it being kind of hot. Doesn't mean it would be best for society - I don't know whether it would be, or not.
Tag team? 
(2)(pi)(e)(i) –––––––––– (5)(pi)(e)(i)
That " wanting to have breakfast with them" doesn't just mean that you want to know them. 
Other videos in this thread: [Watch Playlist &amp;#9654;](http://subtletv.com/_r4lxhze?feature=playlist)   VIDEO|COMMENT  -|- (1) [blink-182 Reckless Abandon Live at Sydney Australia 2013](https://youtube.com/watch?v=IN3BBtbth9U) (2) [Angels And Airwaves There Is 7th Ave. Drop](https://youtube.com/watch?v=3kaCyBGHdsQ)|[4](https://reddit.com/r/Blink182/comments/4lxhze/_/d3qxzow?context=10#d3qxzow) - Damm, he sounds awesome here. Which is what pisses me most. He has the ability to sing well (see this: ), it's just that he didn't want to.  EDIT: Isn't OP's version the same as this?   [Angels &amp; Airwaves There is &amp; Reckless Abandon Warped 08](https://youtube.com/watch?v=j32dzHqBh_M)|[3](https://reddit.com/r/Blink182/comments/4lxhze/_/d3r7voz?context=10#d3r7voz) -   I think right around late 2007-2008 was Tom's best he's sounded since pre-untitled  [BoxCar Racer - There is (live on kilborn)](https://youtube.com/watch?v=l8KrvGpkyH8)|[1](https://reddit.com/r/Blink182/comments/4lxhze/_/d3r2t3b?context=10#d3r2t3b) -  I like this live version much better.  I'm a bot working hard to help Redditors find related videos to watch. *** [Info](https://np.reddit.com/r/SubtleTV/wiki/mentioned_videos) | [Chrome Extension](https://chrome.google.com/webstore/detail/mentioned-videos-for-redd/fiimkmdalmgffhibfdjnhljpnigcmohf)
Oh I forgot to mention that, sorry. The profile text is not green, it's the same as in that screenshot.
Two officials meeting from countries that have regular correspondence is in no way or form enough justification for an ultimatum or even accusation of this magnitude. Had that post been anything else, like a trade deal, you never would've posted this. Thus, metagaming.  
lol vince russo booked himself to win .00013% of the matches he ever booked lol fuck wcw.
I thought about starting a Booker highlight vid a few days ago but then looked online and there are already so many haha 
do it
Guys like that scream of "Notice me, senpai"
I think you need that level of alchemy for it to grow whatsoever. Can't reward the scrubs with upgrades :)
I'm not sure I agree, 4 years is a huge amount of time in politics and there is a large number of the PLP just waiting for him to screw up enough to punish him, they are just playing a waiting game.
I have family in Peterborough. That sounds icky.
Would you rather fight 1 horse-sized duck, or 100 duck-sized horses?"
Venezuela is a socialist country experiencing the end result of socialist policies. People act in selfish ways which is why capitalism provides so much value. You bernouts think theres all this money you're going to be given and it will be awesome, its just not true.
Holy shit. 15 minutes of blowing the first question the fuck out. And didn't donate to Wounded Warrior Project. Holy shit.  AND he didn't do the press conference on Memorial Day. wow. Mind blown. 
Prison Life coming soon then? That and Apocalypse Rising are the only ones I really enjoy a lot.
I take issue with them only being "mostly" accurate.  "AAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAARRRRRRRRRRRRRRGGGGGGGGHHHHHHHHHH" is the most accurate subtitle for a nightmarish scream that I've ever heard and nothing can convince me otherwise. Also they've been pretty consistent with being on time, with the exception of this week.  Though they aren't the first, nor the longest, delay we've had this season.
Then they start running [[Telemin Performance]]
Good position for the little minx as well.
Fucking Genji man...
Yeah, only a handful of people will get B2 and many of the shards that will get him would already have left Dooku and Old Ben behind.
/u/dankology101 is not joking. You probably wouldn't have to ask more than 3 people for a connect out here in California.  We may be in a drought, but we're still the stickiest state.
It means after I left school, I knew diddly-squat about real-world programming and managed to learn 99% of what I know now on the job.  Good employers who hire new programmers understand this and work with you to improve your skills.
Well sure, but there's no logical reason Joe would be more likely than Finn. Joe is a relatively new champion. He hasn't defended it at all yet and Finn is envoking a rematch so I don't consider that a real defense quite yet, so it's illogical for Joe to just come on Raw or SD or whatever out of the blue to join them. Sure NXT champions have been on the main roster before, but that doesn't make it more likely to happen again. I was just saying there was nothing logical about saying Joe is more likely to join the Club if anyone at all.
Caterpillars are notorious leaf-munchers.
I heard he started laughing at all of Klay's jokes, too. Even the ones that weren't funny.
Hello Ronocm13, your submission has been removed due to not containing a [bracketed] spoiler scope at the **beginning** of your title.  Learn more about the new spoiler system [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/arrow/wiki/spoiler_guide).  Some examples of correct titles:  * *[No Spoilers] Arrow Star Blasts Suicide Squad Movie for Ruining TV Show's Plans* * *[S3E2] Arrow Star Blasts Suicide Squad Movie for Ruining TV Show's Plans* * *[Fan Art] Arrow Star Blasts Suicide Squad Movie for Ruining TV Show's Plans* * *[Comics] Arrow Star Blasts Suicide Squad Movie for Ruining TV Show's Plans*   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/arrow) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Haha that's weirdly similar. The reason my Dad was a single parent was because he divorced my schizophrenic mum.
Wish I could trade with you... I have 3 jheet's that I'm going to use as 6* fodder just chillin on my bench...
I can say it for certain then. No murder victims have ever gotten passed it whatsoever. 
Hell. Fucking. Yes.
Because you are using a brand new account, your submission has been automatically hidden from public view and is awaiting moderator approval. If this message disappears, you will know your post has been approved. If it doesn't disappear and you are not given a reason for your submission's removal within 6 hours, you can try reposting your thread. Accounts must be at least 6 hours old to post unrestricted on /r/DarkNetMarkets. Please see [this modpost](https://www.reddit.com/r/DarkNetMarkets/comments/3ghpnr/modpost_throwaway_account_restrictions_better/) for more information and make sure to read [the rules of our subreddit](https://www.reddit.com/r/darknetmarkets/wiki/index/rules). If you are new to this community, please check out /r/DarkNetMarketsNoobs to get started on your journey.  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/DarkNetMarkets) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Well, some are just good at carrying a team.
Downvote probably incoming, but I agree. That dude is fucked in the head.
CLOSED
Nope, maybe, nope.
Because cute
Cool agency, there are alot right now, but cool! Also my agency is EFA, would your agency like to ally?
I'd love to have this - would help my training a lot.
*starts clenching*
I wasn't even born in the 80s, and I don't romanticize that time period at all. I see vapowave and outrun as very 21 century art movements, and I think they're both doing very innovative stuff. 80's art itself can be really over the top
I mean what I say, and I say what I mean.
I did a point by point analysis of each legions pros and cons and chose the legion with max awesome.  I am not obsessed with fire.
Please tell me you have some other backup system you use instead of TM then....
In Soviet Russia, you do not charge your car. Your car charges you!   
I would argue that the only skit that doesn't add anything to College Dropout is Workout Plan. The rest paint a story and add to the theme of Kanye's thoughts on the flawed education system.  and are you telling me you skip Siiiiiiiiiilver Surffffeeeeer Intermission? You're missing out on the wave
So at least you survived.
&gt;I think for a lot of them Gawker has so heavily been built up as the pinnacle of all that is evil that they'll take anyone's side over them and just ignore all that's potentially terrible about that person.  lol you mean like you guys and gamergate  possibly the richest thing ever
Yes I balanced all of them. In the screenshot they are all balanced.  I do remember finding the amount of product but like I said I forgot it. Sorry- but then again this  IS why I came here for help.  200g Fe3O4 /over/ 1 --&gt; Mass of 3Fe /over/ 3 (number of moles of Fe in the reaction correct) 
Safety glass has wire in it to prevent shatter. This is at worst, polycarbonate.  Sadly, that may be harder to break still.
Thank you! I'm hungry too and we ate all the leftovers last night :( oh well. 
can...can we see her butthole also? for science
I honestly hope so.  However I think the X was brought on for practical reasons, basically if the wafer was damaged they'd re purpose it as a non-x.  I just miss the simpler days with no X or Ti.
can we get a list of subreddits with this enabled?
CC got the Forest Whitaker eye strong tonite. 
http://i.imgur.com/7nPIzZg.jpg
America First != Destroying the, oh whose is it, oh yea, American environment.  Shifting pollution, a global problem, around the world at our expense with national solutions is lunacy.
I want to give small minded people a reason to belittle someone they don't know so they can feel good about themselves.
Dude, you are not alone.
Not too rough...;)
I'm wondering if anyone has ever tried flashing FORWARDS towards their own team. I mean, if Voli is going to be so far away from his own team, then maybe it isn't a bad idea to just flash so you can be more safe around your teammates.
Thank you for this.  I normally hate fake pizza but this looks pretty good.  I will have to try this soon. 
God damnit Gary.
On my E36 328i touring I fitted used AC Schnitzer suspension from a cabriolet and it worked wonderfully. Don't worry too much.  You might find the extra ride height on your xi means they used shocks with a longer shaft length. If you only want to do the back go stock. Otherwise there are lots of aftermarket options to replace all four corners and get a firmer ride.
I still say someone should put these onto a big canvas print to hang up.
This belongs in r/swordorsheath
sweet. Cheers mate
Second
Wound up not even being necessary too. Dongers for life.
For legal reasons I can not confirm nor deny
:D
&gt;His sustained long range damage is unmatched;  Well tbh he loses quite a bit in sustained damage to a widow, her 150DPS beats S76's 125 per mag if you hit them all.
Goddamnit. I miss The Playing Fields. Anyone remember that?
Beyond Good &amp; Evil 
And pre-shredded cheese.
I never realized how much I would want my American Doctor to be Jeff Goldblum until now. Especially in 96. Whimsy, handsome, but could still be serious and dangerous on a dime. He could be very much in the same vein as Tom Baker.
Yikes those Smackdown 6 are mighty thin compared to Raw. Zayn, Cesaro, Ziggler AND Neville? Feel like those gotta get split 2-2. Not to mention that's 5 faces to one recently turned heel. (I know this isn't like a real draft, I'm just projecting what the show would look like"
How long does it last in comparison to a HASU Bluetooth? It uses the old 2.1 standard so it should actually drain much more than it needs to.
Uncensored Version http://www.liveleak.com/view?i=d17_1261507259
I was trying to remember the name of that show the other day! Loved it. Was hilarious.
[](/nmm)[Imgur mirror](http://imgur.com/9nUWbTy)   [](/sp)   ---   ^(This is a bot | )[^Info](/r/mylittlepony/comments/1lwzub/deviantart_imgur_mirror_bot_nightmirrormoon/)^( | )[^(Report problems)](/message/compose/?to=meditonsin&amp;subject=NightMirrorMoon)^( | )[^(Source code)](https://github.com/meditonsin/NightMirrorMoon)
Good luck fighting for feminism on Reddit. Pretty much the most pointless endeavor you could partake in. Keep wasting your life arguing with people who don't give a fuck about you or what you have to say. It's not like you were going to accomplish anything meaningful in life anyway.
Nah, we won't. #InMitchWeTrust
"Oh I *know* exactly what I'm doing." She grins, a little evilly. 
Makes sense, thank you for posting.
"I just feel like he's choosing my siblings over me."
I came here wondering the same thing
You mean you're afraid of Santa Claus?
pretty much
You're correct. I'm not calling any game innovative in 2016.
Human, dog , 3 frogs, 2 sharks, a dolphin , smaller dog , alligator 
I don't have reason to lie my friend. I had full 5 man party at main sausan spot, we haven't been contested, only 1 person was doing refill at the time etc etc.
Weed is cheap for me 2 hits cost a $1 maybe, i have no idea.  I pay about $1 for 10mg or so of etz or .50 for a nice dose of Clam
Nice kingy!
Or we could just be happy that a really neat feature like POTG is included even if it isn't THE best play every single time?
It's unbelievable that after so many years he has improved so little. IMHO he sticks to bad drawing on purpose xD
Swap AFHA with Carol Ann and Wake Up with Chamberlain and we've got a winner.   Love the Braun-Y-Aur. Only if they literally make people leave as they play it. 
The small folk love the shit out of Baelor the blessed.  You're right that if they end up killing tommen cersei would go mad queen but I doubt that will happen and I doubt anyone would support her. Massacring your own people is as last resort as it gets.
What other sport has promotion relegation and derby matches? No American sport, that's for sure. What other sport allows entire teams to be cut from a league? What other sport has professional teams within the same attendance radius? Because as I said in my post, yes, there are American cities with multiple teams in the same city, but by design they stay out of each others attendance radius so there is no overlap and therefore no attendance competition. UK football teams are right next door to each other and compete for the same audience - that adds an entirely new level of intensity to it.
Al's been a monster longer than I've been alive. He knows the the value of notes; long and short, soft and loud. The rest of us can talk ourselves around in circles all we want. Guess who's got a guitar in his hands the whole time?
This is just lame great value version of the fuck Steph curry song.
[](/doze)Mirrored post from the tumblr blog "KID NOW SQUID NOW":  [Imgur](https://i.imgur.com/yOxhkCC.jpg)  --- ^(I am a bot. If I did something wrong, ) [^(let me know)](/message/compose/?to=kupiakos&amp;subject=LapisMirror)^(. | ) [^(FAQ)](/46bs61) ^( | ) [^(Source)](https://github.com/kupiakos/LapisMirror)
Nope, try again (¬‿¬)
.
So the environmentalists have managed to bend down, put their heads between their legs, and kiss their own asses for the fine work they've been doing.
Maybe finch will die today and the machine decides...fuck all...and decides to get into its true avatar.....and wipes out Samaritan ..
Title: Love and Wolfsbane  Genre: Urban Fantasy   Word Count: 40, 363  Wanted: notes of all kind. Very open to criticism and just looking to build some understanding of how my writing seems to other people.  Link: https://docs.google.com/document/d/17bBL9PUxVTTuoEtorRkv617bGovFZAFet2YqNpbgVso/edit?usp=docslist_api
What price point would you guys like to see it at? I think Marvels is actually pretty low for what we're getting. How high would you pay? 
Discussion Topic | Devil Fruits &amp; Distribution ---|--- Please keep all Devil Fruit &amp; distribution of Devil Fruit related posts under this.
&gt;Wrong.  Simply asserting that Syria doesn't have a government doesn't make it true just because you say so  &gt;That is VERBATIM what you're promoting. You are literally arguing for competition in force - well that's what it looks like in reality.  "Competing governments" in the same geographic area is an oxymoron.  It's not a government if it doesn't have a monopoly on force over a specific geographic area.  So no, "competing governments" is not what I'm promoting at all.  Much less VERBATIM, which I never said. Stop lying
Excellent guidesheet!   Just a couple things that I think would help a lot. If you made the lines a little more bold (so they'd show through a page better), and maybe add another 1 or 2 slant lines across the page. Just so beginners have more points of reference.   It's great to see guidelines based on actual proportions though! 
He used the meme just like everyone else the past year has.  The meme has evolved, friend.
St. Mary's School for Girls 2nds
James Loney has hit the ball harder in his first two at bats this season than anyone our team has in like 3 games.
Dude lower your maxping, i can reach atlanta servers with 144ms according to server picker (from sweden).
Yep.  On a crop sensor a 35mm is closer to what a 50mm is on a full frame sensor.  
Koss PortaPro ?
Don't have much advice to give as my little monster isn't quite 16 months, but you might enjoy The Honest Toddler and Toddlers Are A-holes on Facebook. I know i do. 
Training seems like a different task, with a different set of goals. 
[](/1c)Nah. I got it covered. You can go continue talking to Gummy.
One of these is not like the other 
Bill Kristol eats his own boogers.
This is so brazen doing this in the middle of a big music festival. Even if it was a small group of guys doing this, you'd think if some of the other 10,000+ guys there saw them doing this to their friends or even a random girl, those guys would be in line for the world's biggest ass kicking.
Yeah, extra nectarine, kiwi, pineapple, bananas are good too, adding some sugar helps too, be it ordinary, or alternatives like Truvia/Stevia or whatever.
In this day in age, you have to choose to remain that ignorant. Then to alienate the largest growing minority, it takes a special kind of fool. 
I couldn't fight. I be too busy jizzing in my small clothes. 
Wow, thanks for sharing this article!  I have loved Set for a long time and now I appreciate it even more.  I may even try to find these source articles to see how crazy it might be to try to engineer puzzles out of this sort of math (though a half hour for a math prof is probably a few weeks for me...).
God I hope not. 
Yeap, you phrased it much better. I forgot how to words. 
If I wouldn't care for the awesome gameplay I would've dropped the gsme a long time ago.   I really love playing SF V, it's a passion for me to play it.   I'm still an amateur at best and try to get the hang of the game but moments like [this]( https://youtu.be/VOXyjt1Drlc ) just encourage me to play it.   Just a few games are that much fun for me, intensiv matches are what keep me going even when I loose. But currently it's not rare I have to matches which are [unplayable ]( https://youtu.be/KLYYoMUGfUg ) and you can't really quit the game other than ragequitting.  Other games allow you to leave matches and this is especially important if the match is unplayable.  But here I am, still playing the game and Capcom fails to deliver on their promises and the non communication with the fans is horrendous.   How can you treat your loyal fans likd this is not explainable to me.  Current the only way to keep my hopes up with the game is to try to play against my friends.   But they're getting more and more impatient and loose interest in the game, there are dozens of games which are worth playing right now like Overwatch (not my cup of coffee but definitely very popular) which work better.  I hoped that SF V would copy the best parts of Killer Instinct and Rocket League including the community pr and regular and constant updates.   It did that but only halfway, a lot is going wrong right now which needs to be addressed but somehow they still couldn't manage to at least hold the release schedule snd keeping the community up to dste. 
Triple H vs Undertaker should have closed the show. 
Don't you mean shelton?
2 bucket method refers to using one bucket with clean water/rinse water which is to be used after you've cleaned a section of the car to rid the wash mitt of contaminates before you put it in the second bucket, which contains your soap. A third bucket is recommended for wheels/exhausts/non painted surfaces only. 
I was wondering if breastfeeding me would be fulfilling for her, but then she got all weirdly specific and Cronenbergian about why it was fulfilling.  I almost feel like this is my fault somehow for having that thought. I will never have pervy thoughts about BrundleMom again.
I'm in an engineering lab... it's pretty embarrassing. 
I don't think she's right for it. Not because she's a woman but based on her prior roles and movie work. Terminator was her chance to do action and all that but even that element was mishandled. That romance one that comes our soon looks shocking
Awesome! Glad Smash as a whole is getting so much attention
I imagine a very cool rail system working this way. We have 4 main rail lines going in the main cardinal directions, then along the way there are signs that say drop item now to be directed to someones base, or to be directed to a local rail system for a town or such. Perhaps in the hub there is a chest with dedicated "railway tickets" that you are supposed to use.
OK, no need to apologize.  My only point was that I can only guess what color you were seeing.
Well most big cities are coastal.
You think you want to try to bring him down?
He's trying to do something about it
I think he's referring to when a team is full of people playing the same character (i.e. - 6 genjis on one team). 
You guys should see the state of r/survivor right now. Opinions are many and differing and blurred posts galore. I for one am excited for a good chunk this cast, including Beast Mode.
With Kai, I can believe....
If some asks you to "Please pass the salt"  or "Please pass the pepper", you pass them together. Salt and pepper shakers travel together. 
you can't make a reference to the current year   knowyourmeme said it was bad and only feminazi do it
Came into the season assuming this anyway. 
I actually thought Ortiz might have made it home on that.
loading times drop to almost nothing if its on an ssd
You got it. The priority meaning I want people to interpret is NeverRace, the second being NeverRice ;)
I think you would like {Shigatsu wa Kimi no Uso}  If you have any interest in Mystery and creative stories I recommend {Shinsekai Yori}  Also [Hunter x Hunter 201](http://myanimelist.net/anime/11061/Hunter_x_Hunter_2011?q=hun), which deserves more than a single epsidoe watched
Unpopular opinion: I don't want aj as champion.   I find ajs matches really entertaining. His buildups not so much. Which ain't his fault but still. At the end of the day I want to see him fight people. But I find aj makes the fight better as a bouncing bird for what the other guy does. I truly think he is a great contrast talent to give great matches too other performers.   I don't know what I'd want to see aj do as a champion other than fight people. 
Wow the last 2 weeks saw a continued downturn  That DOES explain why the big CLICKBAIT diary jam today That place was a virtual ghost town over the holiday week end  And that kind of downturn coupled with their demographic doesn't bode well for bringing in AD bucks or getting a better seat at the DNC table .
Came here to say the same!
It's still inexcusable due to how MMR works. If you are a Grand Champion and search, you will likely get put into a lower ranked game with Super Champions and below for most of your matches. That means Match Difficulty, from an uneven game, most of the time will not grant you normal points for winning (or subtract normal points for losing). Almost all Grand Champions experience this due to how high their MMR is. Now if you party with someone much lower, it searches for matches via Party Average MMR. The worse part is that Match Difficulty is Team Total (or Average) MMR vs Team Total MMR. Since there is a higher population in the lower ranks, and MMR is averaged, you will find a mathematically "equal" match almost every game. You will gain and subtract normal points, which is better than the higher risk that Grand Champions normally do.  If you queue up with a Challenger III, your opponents will likely be Allstar. You being Grand Champion skilled can win these matches more often than not due to how slow they are compared to Grand Champions, and then it becomes an abuse of matchmaking.  And before you complain about "well Psyonix should make it better for Grand Champions and fix it". That's not how it works. There is not very many people near your skill level. It's a population issue, not a matchmaking or ranking system issue. You can't be awarded normal points for beating lower ranked players if you solo queue, because that win was easier for you and promotes inflating rank by grinding easier wins. So that "solution" is out the window.  Not to mention the point of Competitive is to accurately place you and to get equal matches. An Allstar team vs Grand Champion and Challenger III is not equal. They facing one guy significantly above them, and one guy significantly below them. This ruins the point of Competitive.  if you want to queue with a significantly worse friend, do it in unranked and stop ruining the point of Competitive.
You look like you just got halfway through a blunt and decided to take a selfie 
Greeks have long been successful in shipping. Carrying on the Onassis legacy. 
Beakman!? Wow, my childhood came rushing back to me... Saturday morning cartoons, then Beakman, followed by Inside Sports. Good days.
Xemnas as far as feats go.
Don't remind me.  I was a Buccaneers fan.  
I think you may have something backward--as if me saying that the US economic pricing system is somehow in _favor_ of the penny? But in my reply I specifically stated that I'm for the abolition of the penny... So your reply is a bit interesting.  I'm in favor of no waste, as evidenced by my reply;  &gt; What needs to be done is laws to mandate the inclusion of taxes to base store prices and the abolition of the penny.  Creating a system of currency which requires _rounding_ in any form is irresponsible. Especially so when the waste is pushed off on the consumer. No business is going to _round down_ so you don't have to pay that extra penny, instead they're going to _round up_. That's insane.  Abolish the penny, include taxes in sale prices. End of problem.
Well now I feel like an asshole. But the sting is somewhat mitigated by your use of the word 'schadenfreude', so have an upvote anyway. 
Transitioning in ways other than medically - the clothing you wear, the name you use, the pronouns you use, etc.
Well try it lol 
Please don't suck. Please don't suck. Please don't suck. Please don't suck. Please don't suck. Please don't suck. Please don't suck. Please don't suck. Please don't suck.   -Owner of SLI 980 Ti and 3 Gsync monitors.
Matterhorn has been made more comfortable and amazing in the last 2 months, if that was your gripe with it.  Unless it's another reason!
I'm not going to disagree with that.  By the way, Myles, would you consider producing a few plugins for it, just to give it a shot and meet the community? I think everyone would appreciate it, and the plugin API doesn't seem *too* difficult to learn.
No thanks. I'm a fan of James Bond and if they do "Jane Bond" I won't be seeing it because I want to see James. Just like if they turned Lara Croft into a male I would lose interest, because I like Lara and want to see her, not someone else.
not by the advanced stats, not yet, and Amir is far better on offence, believe it or not.
Do you still need mews? i will trade two mew codes for one darkrai code.
&gt; salt, so much salt, aggressive little man aren't you  Yes i am.
I know it might not be the right place to ask, but is there any resource to help me learn how to edit in a similar fashion? Especially the anime esque start? (Not so much because I watch much anime but because I think it's a fun/funny concept to edit around, if that makes any sense). Help would be appreciated ^.^
"The Internet has officially shut down!" 
3647
that state can address all of those issues AND build thousands of houses (stand alone, semi detached, apartment blocks, mixed use - a plethora of types suited for their location, purpose and future use)  I would draw the line at tenement type housing and relaxing building codes, we can do better than that - neither are progressive and both lead to future problems 
¡Sir you made my day sir!
The dirt on Eeloo is a weird light tan color though, which doesn't really match
I've never lived anywhere that allowed smoking inside. And I never would because I don't want to live somewhere where the previous tenants smoked. You can't clean that. It doesn't go away. 
Nope, try again (¬‿¬)
If you click on the unit, then there should be little rectangles with the brigades. Click on each brigade and there is a disband button.
IGN: hfy/GANGMEMBER420 Grind for days dard and can look over walls during au hours Good at small base raiding, canon skills are pretty average
Most policies have a 'commercial use' exclusion, as well as many considering leaving the keys in as contributory negligence.   Unless there is something in the stores insurance, you may not be insured
jajajajja  http://img.ifcdn.com/images/122a0035c41daa1fb2e2df29e357f8bcf07dec27_1.jpg
No you're not, it's okay QnQ
How so? Clinton and Trump are the two most disliked candidates for President we've ever had. They have a rabid core of support concentrated in their own parties (which is why they won the primaries), but outside of that the rest of us are disgusted by both of them and think their supporters are gullible at best. 
Is he attacking the wrong target? 
Do I look like a damned chalkie lover to you!?
IGN: D1VUX  AGE: 16   PVP: 9/10 (1700) last maps can beat most in 1v1s  bb: will do anything  past facs: Jamaica, Dauntless, Swift, MCSG, Venice alot more
Actually, there's no reason why someone couldn't believe in astrology and still be a great doctor. Some people are just better at reconciling and/or partitioning cognitively dissonant views.
Interesting.  Very interesting.  I await to see the results of something like this.  Schools like Missouri are in even more trouble now lol.
Fuck these people, I'm not an anti feminist, but I'm so tired of this double standard. Suddenly gender roles and the patriarchy isn't so bad when it can be used to hurt men.
Great story, well terrible story but great telling of it. I am sure your attorney had a field day with one. As always though, you can beat the rap but not the ride. Curious, why invoke silence while also consenting to a field sobriety test etc.? Do you think the not answering questions just pissed them off thus the arrest? Any chance they really thought you were Jason Bourne and needed a blood draw to be sure? Thank you for your reply, very interesting and well told.
Post the PI's details here and I'll call them. Name/Number etc  PM me your name and the suburb you live in so I can get info out of this guy for you. :)
Solo queue = competitive integrity. Dynamic queue = no competitive integrity.
And? Fizz has gotten 3 very close to each other.
&gt;Hello, everyone, it's antiquatedCreator again. I'm sure you all remember me.  &gt;*crickets*  Ah! THERE are my awkwardness crickets! Gimme here!
They can't really add anyone until sped comes back or hes completely gone from reddit for 60 days I believe. Its up to the community for now.
I'm at -1 now though. :P I just found it funny since the reply is so non-controversial as it can get.
3813
This is the funniest picture and caption I've ever seen
Thanks! My wife and son are, too, and that means so very much to me!
That's the old narrative bro.
&gt;Officially proud to say that I can't be on showdown   Uhhuh
Both were on Playstation. 
the only other language Unity ever supported is Boo (which is a neat LISP/C# hybrid), though i think Unity dropped support for that so it's gone away in 1.1 with Unity 5 update.
Best Drone flying I've seen so far! 
We had a Finn flair before we got any glimpse of who they were or what tanks they had, so I guess they get a medal of participation... but fuck it. The movie fleshed out everybody, which was great.
So the 62% you quoted, that's the important number?  So I can assume to have Chandra online in something close to 62% of games?  That seems good.
Found the meat eater.
/u/barrelcactus
8 man draft.  Followed your draft guide.  How does my team look?  I appreciate all the help.  http://i.imgur.com/4gIcLYF.png
Just play Team Arena or Warzone then - no Forge maps in sight. BTB, Infection and Grifball maps were made by the community - you might not agree with the graphics but we wouldn't have any maps otherwise.
Well...yes. Obviously. What's wrong with having an abortion? No harm is done to anyone. &gt;or be prevented from seeing one parent by the other.  Yes I totally agree. 
Could you show me your measurments (if you don't still have them, just retake them)? It sounds like the calculator didn't give the best recommendation
Come on now, that report is more damagaing than that generous spin you just put on it. She needs to stop running from this issue and come out on top of it. 
Np!
I definitely agree about DLC. 16 is a bit shallow a character pool for a game like this, I feel. Just look at Hyrule Warriors, there are tons of characters AND tons of different weapons for a handful of them. It's not like the Nasuverse doesn't have tons of characters to use, so I'm hoping we don't stop at the 16 we're given initially.
Oh, cute! \^_^
A lot of things are much easier once you realize that everything is isomorphic to Z.  [Here's](http://archive.is/wMMyR) an archived version of the linked post.
i thought the creators said if they got enough support on nexflix they could get a season 3. when i say support i mean if a lot of people watched it
try the US turreted line.
Arrowheads totally came before shields, bro!
And now I know kurvis reddit name, the the stalking commence!!!
Point taken.
My biggest question is will the Cavs win game 4.  I'm pretty sure the Warriors will win both home games and use the momentum to win the next away game.  If I had to bet my life I would say Warriors in 5.  But I don't, so Warriors in 4.
I'm weary but not wary of them.
Oh dear, I loved those books in middle school and had been thinking about rereading them. After this I'm starting to reconsider...
as long as you dont walk around with your hair over face, you'll be fine.
[No, they were a singing team known as Tom and Jerry when their first single hit the radio.](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Simon_%26_Garfunkel)
Hey man if you can't take it don't dish it out.
Literally just got back from seeing Captain America Civil War at the Empire cinema in Rubery. It's a Tuesday, so my seat was half price- £3.90. Just a shame there's not one a little more central.
I'm always looking for an excuse to use that gif.  Anyway, to answer your question, I'll say yes. Variety in these films is always welcome.
At my office job, I brought in a dozen and only one person took one. Three gave me varying degress of grief for "tempting" them. World's changing.
csgo doesnt promote violence wtf are you talking about 
Yup, for those that don't know, it's called last-place aversion. People tend to be against initiatives that would help them if it means they might end up in last place.
ur right, which sub do u recommend?
True, though I liked how they spent more time on Ollie the man rather than the mask.
Big brown and round? That's a coconut fam
Sure!  I'll ask the guys what they think tomorrow.  What are you looking for?  Just a variety of end mills?
Oh please, the only reason its popular in political discourse today is from Cold War era propaganda that attempted to draw a similar political form between the USSR and Nazi Germany, even though the word itself originated before McCarthyism, it has thoroughly been drenched in anti-communist propaganda. The wikipedia article of totalitarianism even makes references to this:  &gt; The concept became prominent in Western anti-communist political discourse during the Cold War era as an effort to highlight perceived similarities between Fascist and Soviet Communist Party states in a way that would justify Cold War political divisions.[4][5][6][7][8]  and   &gt; One of the first to use the term "totalitarianism" in the English language was the Austrian writer Franz Borkenau in his 1938 book The Communist International, in which he commented that it united the Soviet and German dictatorships more than it divided them.[13]  [Heres a more in depth critique of the concept](https://www.iseg.ulisboa.pt/aquila/getFile.do?method=getFile&amp;fileId=250434)
Hi! I'm a long time member of &lt;Winds of Fortune&gt; on Wyrmrest Accord US and this is what we do! We're a caravan that travels around Azeroth, buying and selling goods that we find on our adventures.  We're currently on hiatus due to the pre-expansion lull making it hard to field roleplay, but if your guild doesn't take off before then, consider checking us out sometime!
I was thinking of the elbows resting against the pavement. Grab her wrists and start lifting up and slamming down, over and over. Probably let go of her hair pretty quickly.
&gt; Not only can putting appearances first put you in a bad relationship, but it **can also hurt your walk with God.**  Aaaaand we're done.
Thanks I definitely will check that out. We do plan to be tested quarterly, but I have not had other partners since my last test and until yesterday, neither has she.  But that is definitely going to happen.
I like to play string and wind instruments. My favorite is my harp. What do you do in your spare time?  (OOC: No worries. I hope I can respond faster soon.)
Factually untrue... Lol okay dude it's just Reddit my G. 
weird but that seems much more unsettling to me
Alright. I'm going to come to the assumption from images that my posture is bad.
Nope, try again (¬‿¬)
I am so very sorry.  You did more work than he did to take care of yourself.  Big hug to you.  As has been mentioned, get your own DNA.  Big hug and sorry.
Do you think they have seemed better or worse? Because they had that stretch of 6+ inning games at the beginning of the year.
If you don't get the answer you're looking for, people ask about FP&amp;A all the time and id suggest the search function. 
Bro I live in London.. I went to Costa Rica, Tasted the good life.. And now I have to live hundreds of miles from any decent surf.. I think the closest place to me that's consistent is fistral in Newquay and that's about 4 hours drive away :( 
My prediction: No big name big money transfers this season. Big money or big name, not both, so no James/Griezmann etc. Zlatan doesn't come either. We get a CB as priority then whatever quality is available at the right price.
Can't disagree with that all. I guess his decisions weren't unwarranted, but his apparent mindset was damaging.
Anecdotally, I just saw an Asian woman drive the wrong way down a freeway in Boston. I wish I were joking. 
I haven't played the game either, but Touhou content here in Singapore has gotten much much more common these days, the series really caught me by surprise 
do you also support torture?
You look pretty good in general, but I have a few tips.  1. Bella is your main objective (Besides Veromos) in order to get you into GB10. You can run Vero, Bella, Bernard, Shannon, Acasis or konamiya. Bella and Veromos need to be six starred for this to work. Bella also needs way more speed and accuracy. Don't feel like you have to put her on violent. Try to get 180 speed and 45% accuracy on a swift set and you should be fine.  2. Shannon needs more speed. You want her to be one of the first to move so she can slow debuff or buff your team. Go for Spd/Hp/Hp with speed and accuracy substats. Try to keep her around the same hp, you'll need it.  3. You shouldn't be focusing on this yet, but theomars and perna need more speed and crit stats. Try for AT LEAST 130 speed on theomars while maintaining +1100 attack, and also high crit rate and 120%+ crit dmg. You probably won't get to this point for a loooonnnggg time but I thought I'd throw it in here. Those stats are still pretty low tbh, but they should be attainable in the near future.
Interesting, I think given the option I would rather own one car in the realm of a GT350 and then a fun DD...but having 3 awesome choices every day could be sweet.
Where can I get it?
agreed the food sucks, by the way maggianos was, i assume their kitchen is shit as well
A way to trickle charge powerwall with car in the future?  JB "Its something we have discussed.  The powerwall cycles every day, and secondary can provide backup power...  When you connect car to the house, you are improving the backup situation... Also characteristics of battery in the car - its not really designed for it.  The Powerwall is designed to cycle daily for 10+ years."  Elon: "The car is designed to cycle essentially every week.  Early production Models were made to cycle both ways.  There are potential electrocution risks... different regulatory issues... and you want to be able to use your car and house at the same time." 
I wish XMen were real... Just without the disaster and bad guys.
．．．ｄｏ Ｉ ｈａａａａａａａｖｅ ｔｏ？
OP you need to get a gun.  No matter how big or small of a deal im doing ive always got a 9mm on me.
Gahddamm that is one [helluva tranformation!](https://m.imgur.com/a/CJCZJ)  Good job with that OP! Have you made a killer breakfast of bacon, eggs, and pancakes yet?   I'm bringing my lodge camping with me this weekend. Can't wait to make campfire eggs. 
Drop either Dozier or Maybin to stash Leonys Martin on my DL and scoop Buxton with the extra spot? I need steals, Maybin has been fine but I know he goes cold and where his ceiling will ultimately be capped, Dozier just isn't getting it done and I have pedroia and segura who also play at 2nd, not sure what to do
Yep! That's it. Except normally I have sunglasses on,I'm grinning from ear to ear looking back and forth like "gentlemen, go fuck yourselves." 
oo-la-la
TLDR: kill steal from cops
Why not just allow the transgender topics?  There are only 10-20 posts here a day and its easy to just read the title and pass the topics you don't want to participate in.  You don't really gain anything but you shut down people who want to talk about the issue.
Do you think Bow is still the best weapon?
Have you taken the PCP test yet? I'm currently studying for the same test. Wondering what topics I really need to study. Ive hit hard on Regulation and Airspace stuff as well as communication procedures. Is aviation weather services something I need to touch on as well?
When was the last time you played? In the current patch there's zombies, not sure about Exp. though.
My wife just got the Ruger LC9S (with thumb safety).   It's a very nice gun. She got hers for around $350.
Anything by Bulgakov  (as you already mentioned). You can't go wrong with the house hold Russian names such as Tolstoy and Dostievsky... especially Dostievsky.
not enough cameltoe
Looked like the opening credits to a Bond movie.
I say go for it. If it won't hurt you, you're not attached and you think she'd really like it, then why not? Maybe if it could hurt her like if she expects a relationship out of it then don't do it. But otherwise, old ladies need to be fucked too. 
&gt; Perhaps going under cover of darkness would help too.  This is what I was thinking, yeah. Shave my head at 2:30 AM, dump the contents into the garbage at 3AM (have the garbage already out on the street ready for pickup), then hike on out. I live in an apartment building, but I think I could be quiet enough to not be noticed.  &gt; Now what?  No idea, hence why I said that in my post. :P It's a fun thought exercise! But I have no idea how I'd go about establishing a new identity without drawing suspicion to myself.   &gt; And how long would it take for your current circle of people to report you missing? Would your job call it in if you didn't show up? A significant other, parent, friend? How would you buy yourself the most amount of time?  I Skype with my girlfriend every night, but when work gets busy I typically work nights, so if I were to disappear during one of our busy periods, I could get by about 5 days without her noticing. Phone call home once a week on Sundays, so that's plenty of time as well. Work, though, that would be tricky. If I didn't show up at all to work one day, I think my boss would text or call, but probably assume I was just sick. Two days, they'd start worry. I think any more than that, they'd make an effort to come by my apartment, and if they didn't see or hear anything, they'd probably go to the police. As soon as the police got my phone, they could contact girlfriend/family, but I suppose I could leave it with extra low battery and a pattern locked screen, so it both looks like it's just been sitting there for a while and maybe died, and also has security, to buy myself more time.   So I think I could get 3 days before the police were notified, and then it depends on how long until they can get into my phone or email. As soon as they do that, family and girlfriend will be contacted, and the jig will be up.
Didn't hear about that. Story/Link?
Thanks for your advice. I guess workplaces are just highschools at a latter time. 
We can agree on that, although I guess we have a different perspective on what the ratio is.
it would make no sense but i could somehow see it fucking work. one of my fav albums
Everything looked money except the two things noted by u/prarieformer: the absence of geo fabric, and restraint edging. Bummer, because it looks like you did the rest correctly!   Looks good now anyway, good job!
How is this confusing?
Favorite character: Black Adam.  All rounds no contest, but that's boring, let's give Deathstroke my 2nd favorite a try.  R1-6 Deathstroke wrecks easily, his guns are slightly out-dated but his energy staff should still work and his physicals are ridiculously good.  R7 is harder, they're all super durable and strong and hard to melee, tentavively 6/10 DS due to healing factor + melee skill.  R8: Here's where it gets tricky, Asaries are tough mofos and I'm not sure if Deathstroke can just shoot them until they die since shields. Close range, Deathstroke is really good but still 12 elite soldiers is hard to fight. I'm going to give it to Deathstroke 5/10 due to healing factor, explosive weapons, and melee expertise.  R9: Wrex and Grunt seem too durable and strong to just h2h down both of them at once, add in Shepard and it seems that Deathstroke stops R9.
Gear VR Gallery should play it as well, I cant figure out how to reposition 360 degree vids though.
Personally, I don't know how people are tearing their bands so easily.  Mine tore after 6 months, but it was entirely my fault. I tried wearing it under shorty motorcycle gloves. The Velcro strap overlapped where my band was sitting.  The constant wrist movement caused my gloves to rub against the silicon strap on the band, eventually ripping it.  I probably should not have been wearing it on a motorcycle to begin with as I scuffed up multiple metal watches in the same way. 
I had this happen on my last draft, where i manually selected the class. About 5 picks in i opened the app and manually picked the class, and the picks never updated so i assumed you had to have the app running from the beginning?
Here's [everything you need to know about Gamer-District](https://www.reddit.com/r/wowservers/comments/3zt1t5/gamerdistrict_a_primer/).  To answer your specific concerns in this post, both the things you're worried about are present. There's a teleporter to Dalaran/major cities and other points of interest, and the cash shop has game NPCs integrated in the central area of Dalaran.  My question to you is twofold. What's the gamebreaking difference between the added convenience of high rates and being able to get to Dalaran from Orgrimmar at 2AM without paying a Mage or taking the airship from Durotar? Why is an NPC exchanging your donation points for money more offensive than cashing it out in a website and getting items in the mail? I'm not trying to indict you for your opinion, just wondering what the thought process is there.
*Emi shook her head and gazed outside.*  "I hope not. You think we can escape through the window? I don't want to be trapped in here."  *She turns to Misty.*  "No offense."
And now I'm gonna need to wrangle this quicklt.
dang dude. 
I see you went with Comically bad. 😇
Countdown to Armageddon doesn't worth 1500AP because delay is really long and dmg is not so high. I've tried it with my 4* MODOK in PVP but it was disappointing.
So last week was really a struggle mentally for me. The cut was starting to get to my head and I was in a really shitty place. Weight that shouldn't have been heavy felt 100lbs heavier than it was and I was barely able to finish my workouts because I was just so mentally and physically exhausted. Hadn't taken a rest day in well over two months.   Luckily I had a golf trip to Palm Springs planned with a few bros Friday-Monday and honestly it was the best thing for me. It was a vacation filled with booze, golf, gambling, and dancing my ass off. I came back after three days of this with a little fluff, but in a much better place mentally and absolutely ready to obliterate the rest of my cut.   Long story short, vacations every now and then are great for mental and physical breaks. Smash all your lifts bros. 
You got anywhere where I can squanch?
And now the floaty jabronis are shook
[Original post](https://www.reddit.com/r/Graffiti/comments/4lyd39/hobo_graffiti_around_100_years_old_los_angeles_usa/) by /u/Phlogistoned in /r/Graffiti  &amp;nbsp;  ---  ^(This crosspost was performed automatically as a part of the ImagesOfNetwork.) [^(Learn more about the ImagesOfNetwork, how you can help, and other Frequently Asked Questions)](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_what_is_images_of.3F)^, ^or [^(visit us on Discord!)](https://discordapp.com/invite/0tZsejLgM2vzaExR)  ^([)[^("Remove my post!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_remove_my_post) ^| [^("The bot got this one wrong!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_the_bot_got_this_one_wrong) ^| [^("Stop Crossposting My Stuff!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_no_really._don.27t_ever_crosspost_me_or_my_subreddit.)  ^(])  [](#match "Los Angeles")
&gt;I laugh while I masturbate so I don't feel so bad about crying afterward.
Try to create a new account with the email you're using to  attempt to login (sign up vs sign in). If Evernote allows you to create a new account with this email,  then the account you're looking for is tied to a different email address. 
When I was young I wanted to learn everything. I learned a lot. Alas, I do not *remember* everything. Moral of story: **be picky**.
i married seb because i relate to him more then anyone else honestly 
I never said it was the main combat class. The main combat classes are Infiltrator, Light assault, Heavy assault and combat medic. They all have their pros and can easily beat a heavy, even if the two players are of equal skill.
Tears
i don't have slasher sorry
Gbay fucking agrees with every point this riot employees are making.   Soloq became less toxic? - Yes, cuz of role selection.  You wanna queue times, match quality or role selection? - If we make no role selection, this would be just like *old system*.  This dickrider and his Plat 1-2 mmr with average kda can go fuck themselves.
Nope, didnt leave for overwatch but the bullshit non existing vac waves that make GE a pain in the dick since ages.
Why hasn't he got the ban hammer yet?
Nah Erock would be the best Dad ever. Can we get some love for Big E?
I gave up on playing solo in beta. Not only does it mitigate the issues of running into assholes, having even one person to party with drastically increases the quality of gameplay.   Trust me, you'll enjoy the game way more if you exclusively play in groups. 
Edemame 
Aw man, removed? I had this stashed in a tab for later...
Hi, thank you for the feedback, surely missed an "else" statement somewhere :v   I'll update it tommorow !
PS4 here.  whilst waiting for BaW to download, decided wander around, tying up a few loose ends in Skellige.   Pretty much everything is now back as being an unexplored location, whereas previously had cleared out a number of them (smugglers caches seem to have avoided this, but that's about it). 
If innocent males can be considered guilty of rape just for regretted sex, then why should not such women be considered guilty of grand theft or of fraud?
"Juno," she repeats. "I guess it's nice to meet you too."
Don't fucking smoke just like you tell fat people not to eat. the addiction to nicotine last about 3 days 
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=KuTPGMDAvQs  
He's referring to the interception at the end of the Seahawks vs. Patriots game where the Seahawks were at the goal line and decided to pass it. That touchdown would have won them the game.
&gt;I tried to talk her out of there for a minute but let her be.  Nope.  &gt; I tried texting her 10 minutes later saying I'm sorry if I hurt her only to get a reply that states I'm the idiot and you aren't the one hurting me.  NOPE.  She's 24 and can't have an adult conversation with you about why she's upset, she just throws a fucking tantrum like a child.  Ditch her.  Why put up with that childish shit?
In just gonna get a 5lb tank and a regulator. Then all it needs is some hose a bubble counter and a diffuser i believe. 
And you're still doing it. Even after watching the end of hots being dominated by blink sentry pvz with often no robo or stargate alltogether, you still stick to your shit narrative while pretending you know anything about this game. Jesus Protoss players really are dumb.  &gt; If you can't beat a pure blink opening with mutas you really suck with mutas.  Unlike you, I base my opinions on progames instead of my own. Your games are shit, because you are. And it doesn't sound like you're going to get any better.
That's pretty awesome, and to those interested, [YenPress announced they plan to release the manga and light novels in English!](https://www.reddit.com/r/LightNovels/comments/4k9aad/yenpress_license_konosuba/)  [](#meguminthumbsup)
That's a load of crap.  If it were true, there wouldn't have been huge swaths of old growth forests and dense rain forests around the planet that humans destroyed as we spread.  
I don't know :/
what even makes people capable of being this mad so easily
They're not fighting in Rizin?
She be Mirin
Thanks.
I'd keep those helicopters alive.
Plus you (probably) don't stink at the start of your trip :)
Rezzurection. Moon is probably my favorite of the added BO1 maps. Plus you get the WaW maps remastered. If youre not playing MP, the Rez is a no brainer
No, they're downvoting because they don't fit-in in the West. They're all from Chinese descent and they come on Reddit to pollute the place with their faux nationalism. They love that country in the east but they'd never live there. Love = defending on Reddit.   Comparing the Irish famine with the murder and stupidity of the Great Leap Forward is one of their methods.   Oh, don't say bad things about China... Look, something happened in Ireland more than 100 years earlier.   Usually they do this with America... But they couldn't find a famine there. 
Thank you.
Funny thing is, son reached more people with his work than father did.
&gt;Be a white woman going to a festival in her home country  &gt;Support refugees for the past 1 and a half years with all my heart  &gt;Get rewarded with sexual assault in a place I should feel safe and secure  what's the real problem here?
What level of player would have to be packaged with Stanton to get Thor? Just throw out a name. Or do you think it could happen straight up?
Iowa fan??
Is there anything else you would want for them? Boss souls seem like a little much for that
My order from 20th was not shipped uintill yesterday and was supposed to be delivered next monday (cross atlantic order), told them to cancel it, the guy couldnt and gave me a 30$ giftcard, then I opened another live chat and got a guy that understood english a bit more than the last, and he cancelled the order. Now I have a card locally that i can buy on friday instead from a retailer and a 30$ amazon card. 
Don't ever give up, man. Don't ever give up. You can do this.
She's not uncomfortable dating a shorter guy.  She's uncomfortable dating a guy who might be uncomfortable with her height.    While each of us is worrying that other people will see a flaw in us,  we sometimes forget that they're too busy caught up in worrying that we're going to see the flaws in them.  So how do you overcome it? Ignore it. Completely.  I mean trust me, she ALREADY KNOWS SHE'S TALLER THAN YOU. She's accepted that.  If she see's you Compensating for the height difference,  she's going to see that you're concerned about it.  Which means she's going to become concerned about it.   The absolutely best way approach height issues differences is to pretend that you don't even notice it. 
Love that call so much haha
best shower thoughts i have ever seen  idk if this is bait to drag peoples views out but the cops in america kill countless criminals and innocents every year  far more than people that die by spider bites
...Except for I just realized that's when submitting posts, not in comments. ...I'm an idiot. 
i have hundreds of hours of hours in each, more in chiv. this wasnt meant 100% seriously and is highly influenced by how jaded i am at chiv
I dont fucking know, I have no clue why i made this shit and I hate myself for making it, but i dont care since its eridan
Age of Kings is the oldest game I've played.
Copyrighted material? That's a big no-no. 
The shiny xerneas?
I may not be greatly knowledgeable. But some colleges to my understanding offer ways for you to work for them and that can pay for some or all of your education. At least that's how my mom did her bachelors degree. So check around for a college that fits that bill along with the courses you'd like to take. Then absolutely work your ass off in the areas you need to. Also look into as many scholarships as possible. They're out there they may just not have a lot of money but I'm sure if you find a lot of them they can go a long way. I'm not incredibly knowledgeable in this area but this is what I would do if I were in your situation. Hope I was helpful. 
thank you, TAKE IT BOY  the upvote, of course... KappaPride
looks like smart sales people.
Where's the fifth lift?
Based on my own attitude and behavior as a kid, I think all kids spend time outs plotting their revenge! So, what I did with my son when he was around that age was stand against the wall, I'd tell him where, and look at me and together we would count slowly to 10. It felt like punishment to him because he was taken out of his activity, but it worked great to calm him down. 
Definitely came from the same session as [this](https://youtu.be/WkDhx53603w).
I've talked to a lot of them. Mostly I get "but you have more options in what your character does" as the prime reason they don't just play video games.  Every year more and more people drop TTRPGs for the latest RPG that offers just a *little* bit more to do tho.
To other users posting on this thread (and **not** to the submitter of this particular thread): offering on price check and question threads is not allowed. Failure to abide by this rule may result in a temporary or permanent ban.  Sharking is not tolerated here, and any attempt made *will* result in a permanent ban.  [Please refer to our subreddit's rules as well if you have any doubts.](http://www.reddit.com/r/globaloffensivetrade/wiki/rules)   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/GlobalOffensiveTrade) if you have any questions or concerns.*
/r/fitness is probably where you'd find them, or /r/progresspics 
The 256 kbps is the bit rate, which is completely different from bit depth. The best way to explain it is YouTube's dynamic video conversion. VBR (variable bit rate) will adjust the playback quality when needed. Similar to YouTube, if your connection sucks, you'll get lower quality video; better video if your connection is good. The idea is, if your computer can process it at 256, then it will play it at 256. If it can't, it'll adjust the bit rate lower. That's not exactly right but that's the best way I can explain it.  If I may chime in on the bit depth and sample rate, it really depends on the music you want to make. I use 24-bit, 88.2 kHz for 3 reasons.  1. According to the math, it converts to 44.1 better than 96 (44.1 * 2= 88.2, hence the Nyquist theorem). 2. Since I do a lot of time compression/expansion, it still sounds good since it has a lot of data to work with; especially when expanding (like slowing the tempo but not changing the pitch. 3. It's a happy medium of file size (I use a lot of tracks).  Reading your post, you're recording acoustic instruments and vocals. If your songs have a wide dynamic range (like classical music, very soft and very loud sections), consider using 24/96. If you're doing music with little dynamic range (rock, pop, etc), 24/96 is still fine but you might be better off using 24/88.2, 48 or 44.1.
Thanks was mainly big diet change. 
I had also been lurking on the old sub since January. I understand why many people are upset about the recent shake-up there, especially those who invested a lot of time as active participants.   But, speaking as a casual who has simply enjoyed reading the work of the several talented "armchair investigators", I must say that the actions of the MaM nanny-mods have had close to zero effect on me, and (probably) many people like myself. At some point it became obvious that that place had gone to shit, and then it took me all of 10 seconds to find this sub, and unsubscribe from the old one. All of the quality contributors are here now anyway, so my news feed is unchanged. I couldn't care less if the subreddit has a different name as long as the content/community is the same, which it is.  And now, back to lurking.
That's what got me.. hits the bike *and stops*, then hits the gas again to force it over.  You gotta admire the commitment.
i think my dad might have been one when i was small. He evades the question when asked. Personally i think the illuminati aren't an organisation as much an emergent phenomenon of there being a small number of very rich and powerful people in the world. We think they must be in a club together with some secret but it's just a small number of people who are super talented at business or inherit a great deal of wealth. They probably co-operate when they're not in competition but i doubt they can be arsed with arcane rites and secret ceremonies. 
Could they be anymore vague? I suppose that's the idea. 
Did you lick it?
I missed that detail. That's Eastern European style right there. One rough hombre.
why not just make it 55?
The finals and shit that are on ABC now and NBC back in the day are probably higher
Ico as well
This is great! The wildfyre point and Lann the clever possibly being a dwarf are especially interesting, will add these and credit, thanks!  On point 7, Dan and Dave explained its like a giant data transfer into his head, mostly of stuff he doesn't know or knows an inaccurate version. The vision also shows Robb being killed at the Red Wedding so its not just pertaining to the prophecy. And we may have seen Lyanna (there was a bleeding hand in the vision) which would kind of include Jon. It was literally just frames for the viewer so we don't actually know how much Bran is *consciously* aware of at this point, whether he experienced it like we did or whether each scene came with context from 3ER (my money is on the former: Bran is literally a parallel to the audience within the story, to the point of being virtually omniscient, he'll probably have to go through all that stuff slowly to understand what needs to be done). 
Well that explains everything.
Careful with the CTR stuff or you'll be banned for a week from /r/politics, this is from experience. :s
"FUNNY BUSINESS" 
Power and Endurance charges feature increasing returns (crit builds become more powerful as crit goes to 100%, damage reduction is more potent going to 90%, etc.).  The issue I took with frenzy stacking is moreso that Raider doesn't feel like it helps frenzy stacking builds nearly as much as other ascendancies do.
[Original post](https://www.reddit.com/r/Graffiti/comments/4lyd39/hobo_graffiti_around_100_years_old_los_angeles_usa/) by /u/Phlogistoned in /r/Graffiti  &amp;nbsp;  ---  ^(This crosspost was performed automatically as a part of the ImagesOfNetwork.) [^(Learn more about the ImagesOfNetwork, how you can help, and other Frequently Asked Questions)](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_what_is_images_of.3F)^, ^or [^(visit us on Discord!)](https://discordapp.com/invite/0tZsejLgM2vzaExR)  ^([)[^("Remove my post!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_remove_my_post) ^| [^("The bot got this one wrong!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_the_bot_got_this_one_wrong) ^| [^("Stop Crossposting My Stuff!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_no_really._don.27t_ever_crosspost_me_or_my_subreddit.)  ^(])  [](#match "USA")
Mmm her ass is amazing and I'm loving that sexy outfit ;) she's got some great legs 
Eh an Illaoi skin would be too similar to the Void Bringer Illaoi. Malphite might fit better than Illaoi.
Hillary appeals to our better angels.  50% of the population has above average intelligence, after all.
You look like the poster child for AAA
http://i.imgur.com/6S4gEfu.jpg
Can we re-wire those nerves?  I want to know what happens if you split the brain and have one whole eye working of each hemisphere.
I hate this place. Not the sub, I love subs, oh my god its a penis, sexist subway.
Thatd be so dope
They eat it. That's what you do when you're poor. If you're planning on eating fish from around the city, [check the current list of advisories,](https://www.health.ny.gov/environmental/outdoors/fish/health_advisories/regional/new_york_city.htm) and here is a [brochure with more information, including areas of Long Island.](https://www.health.ny.gov/publications/6532.pdf)
I must say, it has never ever crossed my mind to get out and confront someone, no matter how stupid the driver was.
There seem to be some sad precedents: http://www.vox.com/2015/11/2/9661162/anonymous-kkk-bogus-list
The sound of my girlfriends breathing while she sleeps.
Me neither until I was in an accident (Jan of last year). They paid for the gear, bike repairs, time off work, medical bills, and "emotional damage" (was having nightmares of the crash).  40mph crash, prius pulled into my front tire (they were going maybe 5 mph), I went over their hood into another lane. The lane was stopped so I didnt get run over, but still hobbled off to the divider. Prius driver didnt get out of her car until my wife showed up and started yelling at her. My wife actually showed up before the cops.
Thanks man. Look above and check me reply, pm me and I'll give you some tips and you could try it for your character.
I can't play it. Not because of fps or anything. It just doesn't seem to work on certain computers according to the forums and despite knowing about this issue since release it never got fixed. :(
No that has sold.
Maxwells silver hammer.  Death! Yay!
It can always be toned down, his damage output is super low, and the Ult time can be reduced. He gives less armor than Tor and gives it slower than Sym. so I figured he was in a decent place.
Rosp does close to nothing for pvp... i have 40 vig + rof +2 and have never been one shotted by anything not even buffed bkga + hornet before the latest patch
Awesome, thanks for the insight. I'm about to crush the colorado trail at the end of the month and have been doing some serious food sourcing. Walked into a butchers shop and pretty much bought every ounce of jerky they had. What kind of non-established trails do you have in mind? I've heard in the US you are never more than 30 miles from a road (though some of the old forest roads are barely roads).
Empty set. Vacuous truth.
Thanks!
4k for orion
I guess this can be contrasted with lawyers maybe... usually not well-liked, but become important when you really need them.
*Nods.* So. Anything else you want to know about the camp?
Yeah but you need good thrusters, for the 6,7 if not then you are boned, you also need good pip use and knowledge of how to evade the bugged npc weapons systems.   no point in pd and chaff if you are just running away, with good thrusters you can out run/doge the missiles, so shield boosters it is. Also to save weight/power no weapons, because lets face it, you are not going to be fighting and if you do you are toast.
I've never received any hate messages. I generally do pretty good. I play attrition most times. Was wondering if you wanted to 1v1?
but it was?
How does Jerry Lawler get the okay from WWE to go ahead and do these types of things, but if a wrestler wants to do something remotely close to on their own, wwe throws the kitchen sink at them?
With Ant you also have the awkward possibility of him eventually trying to fuck one of your girlfriends when you are in middle school.  
That's not even remotely true... There literally no difference between a private server and gmail/hotmail. It's the same fucking thing
I dont go there much but usually to help. But im sure you know me
And with your elbow not your hand. Otherwise you're just gonna touch everything with your germy hands. 
Well some are sarcastic and some are not...
^ This right here is probably the best thing you can do, otherwise try sniping in games like tf2 and cs:go, if overwatch is going to be your first competitive fps experience you've got a long way to go to even be considered decent, but depending on how much time you put it's achievable. 
&gt; meme team  I like that.
Cool thanks!!!
Discussion Topic | Weapons ---|--- Please keep all weapon related posts under this.
&gt;I'm curious as to what makes them so over with wrestling fans much like the nWo was back in the day.  I would argue that they're no where near as over as the nWo was in 1996.   -The nWo helped turn WCW into the #1 promotion.   -The nWo dethroned the WWF.   -The nWo t-shirt is one of the most iconic wrestling t-shirts of all-time. Turn on any current wrestling show and chances are you'll see someone wearing an nWo shirt, 20 years after the group's formation.  -By your own admission, you "kind of know who they are," in reference to the Bullet Club. In 1996, before the boom of the IWC, it didn't matter which show or promotion you watched, you knew exactly who the nWo was.  Let's compare the Bullet Club to the Four Horsemen. Thirty years after the formation of the Horsemen, people still hold up the four fingers at wrestling shows.  The Bullet Club is just one of the latest stables in a long, long line of stables in wrestling. They're popular at the moment, but it's hard to say how they'll be remembered in twenty, thirty years. Do they have the staying power of the Horsemen or the nWo? I doubt it.
Barbies, stuffed animals, chemistry set, a slightly obscene number of 90s-era kids' DIY craft kits, blocks, tinker toys, space shooters, jigsaw puzzles, Lite Brite, devil's sticks (those juggling sticks you see a lot at Renaissance festivals), paper dolls, play "house" type stuff (fake food, etc), costumes. I also spent a lot of time building forts out of anything my parents would tolerate me rearranging.
When the bug bites... I've been itchin to upgrade for a while now.
I remember Homer calling his snacks horse doovers and it took me years to get the joke. 
What will color my opinion on it is how much power strength it will require to achieve.
It seems like he has some sort of complex from the past he's trying to make up for with irony. But to be fair he does have three PS3s and I don't so he is the ultimate victor. 
Survival is the only way way too play.
"Best kidnapping ever Dad!"
If a group of guys tried to do that to my wife, girlfriend or God forbid daughter, I really don't care if I die, I'm taking at least one with me And ripping some dicks. Fuck this shit I'm mad now
I Uh.... May have a bit of a surplus, so very cheap. 
I understand all that, but I think you might be underestimating the meaningfulness of gifts in certain occasions. Christmas presents, bar and bat mitzvah gifts, etc. Absolutely one of those occasions is someone's wedding.   And, again, I get that gifts "are meaningless to you." That doesn't mean that they are for anybody else. As evidence, I direct you to every culture, ever in the world that has something even approximating marriage: you bring a God damn gift.  And, finally, AGAIN, you haven't been married. You haven't budgeted for months, made tough decision about how much to spend on what or who to invite, haven't fought over priorities, etc. You haven't had months of stress culminate in a single day. Because of that, as wonderful as your "five languages of love" bit is, you are wholly ignorant of what the marriage process is really like, and thus unqualified to make a judgment on whether NOT giving a gift is acceptable. It's really, really not. 
New leather, especially inside a car
&gt;But to reproduce it? To push it forth from my lips as if it were my own? If I claim to have done this for "the love of the music," I'd say that I've completely missed the point of the music.   How does covering a song imply that you feel like you've gone through the same things the original artist has? What if you just want to cover it because you really like the song? Why are we even tolerating ideas like, "one group of people can cover literally any song, but this group of people shouldn't cover these songs"?   &gt;Consume it. Understand it. Empathize with it. Critique it. Challenge it. But reproducing it, and claiming it as your own, even in a small way? Surely you can see how legitimately offensive that is.   So, I can listen to it, think about it, and of course purchase it, but my own participation is inappropriate? I feel like we've heard this situation in American history before. Specifically regarding race.   Why is this okay to do now.
this didn't tag me! Whattt but yes!
I'm not, mine is 4 months old, i use it everyday Dpad is great still feels good, clicky, very resposive not like the ps3 and i mostly play fighting games (street fighter,king of fighters, etc). The ibuffalo feels light, but for the price it's almost nothing to lose.
Ugh...  Let me look that up. https://youtu.be/krkKUsrdS2M
maybe that is the reason it happens so often? 
I appreciate the offer but I'm looking for CiB games for Gamecube at the moment. Thank you anyway! Best of luck.
All depends for performance a wider tire is usually better, a more narrow tire gets you better fuel economy, is easier to drive around and probably cheaper. All depends on your goal.
I was forced to run laps around the house to earn meals and put on the grapefruit diet when I was 5, and taught how to purge when I was 10. Add in constant emotional abuse and fat shaming... And yeah, you end up with a 38yr old who has never had a normal relationship with food or exercise. I'd say more but I need to go for a run. 😕
The 6* hero selector guide says May is useful.  Where do you guys use her?
I can taste banana!  Mustard for battle!
Also, regarding your likely physical condition/appearance following any reasonably serious crash.
Who is they?
I think zipper merges should happen at the end of the lane, giving you the full merge lane to line yourselves up without having to cause people to brake or accelerate abnormally. Otherwise there are many locations where the merge lane is actually coming from a lighted intersection and causing a backup 75 feet early will severely impact the actual intersection. Traffic or not, merge near the end of the lane. 
Peavy and Samardzija switched bodies! It was Peavy that pitched yesterday.
Oh my god!! Terrible. I'm glad you're doing better.
Last year was SO much more crowded than the years prior, and in general it was a much younger(teenage) crowd. It still is a great time and you have space to spread out in enough areas, but this is one of the biggest factors for my group of friends and I to venture out of the city to a different fest this year. 
Level 20: 20/100 HP  Level 40: 40/100 HP  Level 60: 60/100 HP  Level 80: 80/100 HP   Level 100 100/100 HP  I assume you start at 10 or 15 or something.
Right. I don't dispute that just doing that would make it better. But if China really wants to make an A+ city, I think what I said would be ideal. A lot of engineered cities in the Middle East are going this route.
lets hope for him another one doesnt get unboxed #gg
[EVERYTHING] means comments about any event or theory are fine without spoiler tags.  If you are concerned about spoilers, leave this thread immediately. For more info on spoilers and tagging please check the [spoiler guide](/r/gameofthrones/w/spoiler_guide).  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/gameofthrones) if you have any questions or concerns.*
TRIUMPH
I believe the proper nomenclature when adding "the" is to drop the "I-" - such as, I'm taking *the 84* to Gresham.
you run very high doses. Go hard or go home mentality. haha
cuz it need some shit like being friend for a year 
My informed consent is a doctors office.  He's an MD.  And graduated in 2012 from university of Texas.  It's a clinic for mtf and FTM.  It's at a regular health clinic but the trans stuff is at night after 5pm its called the night clinic.  They even have their own lab.  It's awesome!
Something to discuss, differencies about hourbuilding between countries
Seeing as you replied to me but not the other fella's comment, I take it you and I both know that being anti-rape is not what is considered narrow-minded in this context. 
I love love love tall girls and tall girls in heels...??? O. M. G.  I'm sure you look AMAZING. Fuck it up, girl.
No Anal for Old Men
That's actually how I did it. One of the guys with us wanted to use his credit card but I just pulled them out. Was not the best decision of the day. 
You can purchase packs with REAL MONEY then use the dust to craft the card you want. I see no difference here?
That is sick! I want to eventually get the empire insignia on the other shoulder so I can be a filthy turncoat.
Trac-shot OP!
Yeah I had assumed it's pretty outdated, thank you. 
Hey, /u/ragnarokrobo what did you think of the movie *Poon/Cock Saints*?   http://i.imgur.com/Ah2HI1b.png ---   updated flair for /u/deutscher_aggie
Haha, very true... I mean, WoW has it's amazing questlines like Wrath Gate. But even that can't beat the nostalgia of quests like Underground Pass and Monkey Madness.
I have seen evidence of the opposite. This article says only 2.3% of all-cash deals are from Mandarin speakers. http://www.marketwatch.com/story/chinese-all-cash-buyers-of-us-homes-have-tripled-since-2005-2015-10-09
TRADE COMPLETED WITH: /u/catecoin  ITEMS TRADED: $74 BTC vs $80 Amazon.ca
I didn't define it. The Messenger of Allah (saw) did.
It wasn't a fart like he thought.
Why are we still considering her a viable candidate after the IG report.
If you see it continuing to happen, ask what their goal is, if it's short term, they'll say it's to get to x weight or whatever. If they are just being unhealthy, or God forbid anorexic, they won't have an answer. Most of the time. 
Not saying that this happened to you, but on another sub that I know of, the accounts of experienced/confirmed traders have been hacked to trick lower tier sellers/traders. I really hope that's not the case here. Let us know if your trade went through.
I'm already dead inside, so what you gonna do about?
You should inject it intramuscular then. You won't affect your nose at all.
Alyssa is honestly magic
Yeah Im pretty sure he saved Addison's brother because he made appearances on Private Practice as well.  Maybe he made those appearances before he got sick though, I dont remember.
What would you want the manual settings to be for the sample?
[Original post](https://www.reddit.com/r/EarthPorn/comments/4lyd5j/el_capitan_i_made_a_wallpaper_for_your_iphone_6/) by /u/andreinotes in /r/EarthPorn  &amp;nbsp;  ---  ^(This crosspost was performed automatically as a part of the ImagesOfNetwork.) [^(Learn more about the ImagesOfNetwork, how you can help, and other Frequently Asked Questions)](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_what_is_images_of.3F)^, ^or [^(visit us on Discord!)](https://discordapp.com/invite/0tZsejLgM2vzaExR)  ^([)[^("Remove my post!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_remove_my_post) ^| [^("The bot got this one wrong!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_the_bot_got_this_one_wrong) ^| [^("Stop Crossposting My Stuff!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_no_really._don.27t_ever_crosspost_me_or_my_subreddit.)  ^(])  [](#match "Yosemite")
Hey, thanks a lot for the info. Currently on my 00-04 cargo watch now.  Your accommodation sounds great. I went downstairs to grab some food and a drink and I have to tiptoe through.  4 ships is a lot, do you guys from UK only take 90 days internships to get your 360 days? The pay is pretty good at least compared to mine, I think you get about 900 euros, something like this.  Duty engineer sounds okay. I know how fucked up it is to get woken up in 3 am in the evening to work for an hour. Especially if you got to start again at 8 o clock. Big turn-off of the job for me tbh. Do mates get this as well on the bigger ships? On this small ship for example the mate has the 12-6, but when we do mooring at 8 o clock he will have to be on deck again.
Witch's Locks +5, combined with Fire Clutch Ring, Carthus Bloodring, Flynn's Ring and Ring of Steel Protection. Master's attire, no shield, dual wielded. Throw in Power Within, and it's honestly pretty OP due to its insane range, great damage (especially with the rings and Power Within), ability to chip through shields, and immunity from ripostes.  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-jMAIMdYMd0 Here is a very short fight I recorded a while back when I was first playing around with it. The special move Flame Whip hits 3 times with great reach. Not a very impressive fight I guess. You can easily spice it up and only use Flame Whip sparingly and use the other moves more often. Flame Whip gets a boost from the Fire Clutch Ring though, so it's very effective.
&gt;[**Lia - Bravely You (TV Size) [Alyce's Extra] +HD,HR,DT 99.61% 593pp [1:06]**](http://youtu.be/iVxFMTjCB1M)  &gt;&gt;One of the best play I ever did.  &gt; [*^filsde ^lama*](https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCVwcu_2_YTGslycyUj744aA) ^in ^Gaming  &gt;*^278 ^views ^since ^May ^2016*  [^bot ^info](http://www.reddit.com/r/youtubefactsbot/wiki/index)
So far I only have one internship set up for Fall semester for a pure software company, but I'm in the interview process for a position at a bioinformatics company. It's pretty rare to get a position in industry (I've only seen two or three positions at biotech companies for undergrads in Canada), most companies are in the States and don't want to sponsor for visas, or are looking for grad students. 
Same, and the only ones I attract, I'm totally not attracted to.
I think they should give the maid ntuc vouchers for 18 yrs instead for helping us get rid of such a shitty human bean
Asta gives him a hug. She feels like that's the only thing she can do right now.
Kim Jong Un launches over 9000 nukes at everything.
Antje Utgaard. [Instagram](https://www.instagram.com/awesomeantjay/?hl=en)
First kid: dresses and such ironed and hung in closet, play clothes folded in dresser. Second kid: doesn't own any clothes that need ironing, stuff what fits into dresser drawers, rest in clean laundry basket.
"No, I wouldn't. God, please no."
Imagine living for 40 years only to be killed by a fucking tire. 
     - Costanza
I thought the characters' reactions and what they took away from the events to be much more realistic than other series I'd seen. Obviously how we feel that was executed differs but I quite liked it. 
Yeah minimum is 30. Average for most boats is around 45. 
Kids and animals?
I was thinking most songs by Maiden would fall into this category. So much great story telling in their music
Bless your heart. 
Same here, I was playing as Orianna on Silver 5 and The enemy team had a Jhin, he was complaining all game that I wasnt Silver and That i was boosting that account lol
yeah but who says they get 30% of losses?
To be fair...I don't think Figuarts come with the Tamashii stands so you can't really dock points for that.  The shield straps are probably a problem though seeing how they kind of sucked in the AoU version too. 
I suspect OP was an alt account and someone's targeting this sub trying to cause trouble.
That's literally the stupidest logic i've ever heard.  "Why would a guy have two personalities on and off the court?"  Holy shit dude.  Have you ever played any sports?  literally every athlete, especially really competitive ones, are way different on the court than off.  Westbrook has done some incredible things for the community to and is, by almost all accounts, a really great guy off the  court.  wouldnt know it by watching.  this is seriously one of the stupidest things ive ever seen on this site.  Holy shit.  there are some truly amazing people who, during sports, become absolutely cut-throat - anything to win.  Doesn't make em bad people off the court.  I feel like you've never, ever played basketball if you don't realize people can be way, way, way different in the heat of the moment during an intense game,
Thanks 
Effected or affected?
Draco seems to have moved past it at the end of the series, so yeah.
The problem with that is Gear Fourth rag dolled Doflamingo meanwhile both Sabo and Marco have shown that they can challenge an Admiral although not beat one, and Luffy is no where near ready to face an Admiral yet.
This is my process:   1. Think of amazing melody in the shower 2. Forget said melody before I can write it down or record it  3. Repeat ad infinitum 
Take a good look at these antlers they helped me plow yer mum
At $199, this is better than many market analysts expected. Positive stock price trend expected over next few days.   **WSJ Article text:**   &gt; Advanced Micro Devices Inc. is angling to lower the cost of virtual reality, targeting the field with a new line of graphics hardware priced at $199—half or less the cost of comparable products.  &gt; AMD said the first chips based on its new Polaris design are expected to arrive in graphics cards for personal computers at the end of June. The company aims to help push the starting cost of PCs that can deliver VR experiences as low as $799 from above $1,000.  &gt; Consumers also face the cost of the latest generation of VR headsets—$599 for the Oculus Rift from Facebook Inc. ’s Oculus VR unit, for example, or $799 for HTC Corp. ’s Vive.  &gt; But the need for a PC with an add-in card that includes a beefy 3-D graphics chip is another barrier that stands in the way of widespread adoption of VR. An online survey conducted in April by the Advanced Imaging Society found that 68% of respondents said VR equipment was too expensive.  &gt; “Less than 1% of PC users have systems that are capable of doing VR,” said Raja Koduri, senior vice president and chief architect of AMD’s Radeon technologies group. “The entry point is very, very high.”  &gt; AMD said its new Radeon RX cards, certified for use in VR by HTC and Oculus VR, deliver performance equivalent to that of $500 graphics cards used for VR.  &gt; Patrick Moorhead, an analyst with Moor Insights &amp; Strategy briefed on AMD’s strategy, estimated that the current minimum price on cards comparable to AMD’s new models is $399. He said the $199 pricing comes as a surprise.  &gt; “It’s great for getting more people into VR,” said Kelt Reeves, president of Falcon Northwest Computer Systems Inc., a boutique maker of gaming PCs that serves the market.  &gt; AMD competes with Nvidia Corp. in the chips known as graphics processing units, or GPUs. Mercury Research estimates that Nvidia had 70.6% of shipments in the first quarter of 2016 to 29.4% for AMD, though the latter’s share is up three percentage points from the fourth quarter.  &gt; Standard practice in the GPU business has been to start new product lines with high-end cards that command hefty prices and profit margins. Mr. Koduri said AMD hoped that breaking from tradition by starting with a lower-cost model could have a bigger impact. For one thing, he said, computer retailers prefer to stock machines for less than $999.  &gt; Nvidia on May 7 introduced a new flagship model called the GTX 1080 at a $599 price tag that is expected to succeed a $1,000 model called the Titan X. Nvidia also introduced a $379 model called the GTX 1070, which is likely to be seen as competition to the new AMD model.  &gt; “It’s up to Nvidia to come up with a lower-priced card,” Mr. Moorhead said.  &gt; An Nvidia spokesman had no immediate comment.  &gt; AMD, based in Sunnyvale, Calif., plans to formally announce the new chips early Wednesday at the Computex trade show in Taiwan.
She was a Cheap Trick
Thanks for the schoolin'.  I shoulda left it at "Get an immigration attorney".
Now I gotta check out Creep.
Did you realize that the jellyfish on the Man-O-War is a reference to the Portugese Man of War? It is one of the world' most dangerous jellyfish, albeit being 99% water with no brain or anus
I was in the North America Nebula bouncing around in my srv thinking now would be a really bad time to wreck. The nervousness coming down on a plant over a 1,000 light years away was pretty intense. I was wondering what other people use?
Fuck....you...
Hmmm.... no. If the fractal pattern continues then they will all be pretty much in profit no matter how long they hodl.   All my money is on /r/buttcoin denial futures. All the guys you hate are about to be annoyingly wealthy and they will believe it's because they are smarter than you. The sad part for you is that it's going to be true.
IT'S FUCKING SHIT. 
Virgin galactic 
Dr. Horrible's Sing-Along Blog (I think it's still on there). It's mostly sweet and funny. 
Objection your honour; leading the witness..?
I have lived in Israel before. I've lived in Haifa, Jerusalem, and Tel Aviv. I've been to the West Bank, too. While I lived there I spent a lot of time making friends with locals.  I will admit that there is confusion around the word "Jewish," because it can refer to a religion or an ethnicity, which are two separate things. Religion is the set of beliefs and rules that someone believes in, which affects behavior. Ethnicity is an irrelevant piece of your DNA which has little influence on your beliefs and behavior outside of general cultural indoctrination, but which our society has decided is important. Take a Jewish newborn and put him in a Muslim family and he'll grow up Muslim, just as his Muslim cousin would grow up Jewish if raised by Jews. By the way, Jews and Muslims are straight cousins, descendants of Abraham. Seriously, it's time we started acting like family. And the Quran says you guys have to respect the "people of the book." And furthermore Jews and Muslims were allies throughout most of their shared history, against the Christians who oppressed both our groups in Europe and at home in the Middle East.  In the case of Muslims and Arabs, it's easy to tell when someone is talking about the religion or the ethnicity, because Muslims are a religious group that includes many ethnicities, and Arabs are an ethnic group with members in various religions. Jews don't have that luxury. There's no easy terminology to distinguish between people who believe in Judaism and people who were born into a particular irrelevant bloodline. Judaism is a religion, characterized by the belief in the Torah and its rules. Lots of people are born Jewish - just as people are born black or gay or Chinese - but raised in secular or atheist households where Judaism is irrelevant. Outside of Israel, Judaism is generally seen as a style of food preparation and fashion, rather than a set of religious views. Those who take Judaism the religion seriously - the so-called Orthodox - do not recognize non-Orthodox rabbis or traditions, because they have largely abandoned the Torah and treat Judaism as a flexible, nebulous and unstructured philosophy, which it never has been. Non-Jewish Jews are generally unaware of this.  Within Israel, among the subset of people who can be defined as ethnically Jewish but religiously non-Jewish, which is the majority of Israel's so-called Jewish population, there is a great contempt for Judaism the religion, as represented by the so-called Orthodox. If this is confusing, it is because no terminology exists to differentiate what I, personally, call Jewish Jews (the Orthodox) and non-Jewish Jews (people who identify as Jewish but either don't know, or reject, the Torah). By the way, I learned all of this from living in Israel.  In Israel, it is very common to see non-Jewish Jews express outright contempt for Jewish Jews, for those who show the world through their behavior and clothing that they believe in Judaism the religion. And... for good reasons. The orthodox are 50% of the problems in the country (the other 50% being radical Muslims). The orthodox want actual biblical rules, called Halacha, to become real civil law in Israel, just like Republicans want that for the United States. This is already the case to an extent, which is why Jews have to fly to Cyprus to marry Christians or Muslims, but it is a very small extent. If it were a large extent, Israel will end up looking a lot more like Iran or Saudi Arabia, with separation of men and women, dress codes, frequent and mandatory prayer, vigilant xenophobia, shutting the country down on Saturdays, and so forth. They also reproduce like rabbits (as religious people will do). For those reasons, Non-Jewish Jews, those Israelis who will call themselves Jewish if you ask but reject the Torah and its followers as soon as that's brought up, are against it. They prefer to keep Israel looking like a secular Western democracy (imperfect as it is, with treatment of the Palestinians that I agree is unfair, but certainly better than any of Israel's neighbors) than a theocracy.  (There are also those within the Orthodox Jewish community who believe that Israel shouldn't exist because God sent the Romans and Babylonians to destroy the holy temple and drive the Jews into exile as a punishment for abandoning the Torah, and that the Jewish state should not come back until the third temple is built where the mosque is now and the exile is personally lifted by the one who imposed it. But lots of people believe lots of things. That's religion for you.)  I believe Israeli settlers in the West Bank fall under the category of believers, or perhaps - another common phenomena that can be widely observed in Christianity and Islam - people who pick and choose what parts of their holy book they believe in. Perhaps that is how they justify believing that God promised the Holy Land to the Jews while still burning fruit trees (against Halacha) that belong to people of other religions. They are their own category and they are extremists, but you cannot blame all Israelis for the behavior of the settlers. That's like blaming all Muslims for the behavior of Daesh.  To answer your question:  &gt; Then what are they doing in Israel in the first place? Their only claim to the land is because it was "the promised land" according to the bible, if they even don't want to do anything to do with Judaism they can go elsewhere instead of abducting the land from Palestinians.  First, they were born there. Nobody who is born anywhere has any control over all the events that occurred in the world prior to when they were born. If you're going to judge people because they were born in a particular place at a particular time, that makes you an asshole.  Second, because the Jews came from there originally, just like you did. There were Jews in the Levant before the Romans and the Greeks and the Muslims and the Babylonians and the Persians and the Assyrians; they were there for more centuries than you can count. They were kicked out, they came back, they were kicked out again, they came back, but they always considered that region their home. Europe was never home. Europeans were assholes to the Jews, frequently killing and burning them and worse, all the way into the 20th Century.  Third, because of history, which is a force none of us can control. In the 1880s, when Palestine was in Turkey and Europe was starting to get dangerous again, there was a small population of Jews living there. As Europe became more oppressive and more dangerous for the Jews, many began moving back into the region. After a horrific genocide in the 1940s, basically Europe's entire Jewish population - followed by the rest of the world's Jews, many of whom were living in Muslim countries and had gotten kicked out - all fled to this place they considered their ancestral homeland, which became the State of Israel. At the time, the land had recently passed from Ottoman to European hands and was in a political limbo at the beginning of the decolonization period. Yes, there were already people living there, and yes, many of them were displaced in a war known by Abraham's older children as the Nakba and Abraham's younger children as the War of Independence.  I agree that it's a shitty situation, but there is a country in the Middle East called Israel now and it's been there for almost a century, it's not the first time there was a Jewish state there, and the people born there are innocent, Jewish though they may be. Just as Palestinian children are innocent. You can't expect this whole country of people to just pack up and move somewhere. That's not realistic. Look at Syria. Syria's mass exodus is the entire world's disaster.  All of the other states in the Middle East are Muslim, all the way east to Indonesia. How come the Muslims can have so many states but the Jews, according to you, shouldn't even get one? Why can't we recognize our common identity as Semites with our closely related languages and common origins and shared land, and get along?
ez 2b
uh, good pitchers pound the strike zone. They work the quadrants and don't leave any pitches center cut. 
I am not trying to boast in anyway =(, this thread helped a lot.  Its just there has been so much hammering away at sun exposure.  I wear sunscreen everyday too now and know the detrimental effects, but I think exercise, sleep, stress, genes also play a role.  Hey what can I do stop this from showing itself in my 30s?  retinoids? 
No, but right decade.
I think they've been the same size since NXT. Did you mean main roster debut or wrassling in general debut?
Automatic chair ng ilang government organizations ang VP. Forgot which, though.
I'm having the same issue with the puddles.  Look like nuclear waste
I've been listening to Pouya and $uicide boys for the past week. They're both pretty solid. $B can be hit or miss at times but they're worth checking out. Pouyas new album is 10/10 for me though. Underground Underdog is the name.
Id be interested :)
Usually, once someone says "You're doing the Lord's work," they'll leave it at that. You're the first that I've seen to acknowledge those who may not believe in God. Then on top of that, you added how we can think of the act as noble and worthy of acknowledgement regardless of belief in God. You've not only respected, but have also completely acknowledged non-Christian peoples' beliefs.
Any trade involving real-world money or the exchange of items/cash outside of the standard Steam trading window should be treated with extra caution.  We strongly advise you to consult our guide on [trading real world money](http://www.reddit.com/r/GlobalOffensiveTrade/wiki/moneytrades) and/or message the moderators of /r/GlobalOffensiveTrade with any questions or concerns at the link provided below.  Please trade safely!  Note: this comment is for informational purposes only. It is not accusing you of being a scammer.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/GlobalOffensiveTrade) if you have any questions or concerns.*
So shit is pretty bad right now huh
They poop in the streets?
Yea that was the [first thing I thought too!](http://i.imgur.com/NAuh4sI.gif)
http://youtube.com/capcomfighterstv should have it asap
Cryogenic hydrogen.   We sent kids to the moon with it.
Which one?
A fellow Iron sight enthusiast! It's extremely disappointing how they made the irons in BF4. Very few weapons have unique sights, the majority of them use generic "Wal-Mart" rail mounted sights that are obstructive and ugly. I wish more weapons had sights similar to the SV-98.
Okay apparently you are incapable of understanding that she was secretary over a period of time and multiple different things could happen over that period of time.  So I guess we're done here.  
The picture kinda makes him look like a Kingdom Hearts character. I'm not complaining, just noting.
Prairie City!
Centipedes...  If you have a cockroach infestation Centipedes will kill them all. 
Prince? I mean hes not even a fielder. 
&gt; Not the fourth girlfriend I ever had. The fourth one that had come out as a lesbian while we were dating.   lmao
To be fair, Olenna thinks everyone's a putz except herself and Tywin.
They were talking about a cross server PF (along with the upcoming raid finder) in Live Letter XXIX
If you need any pieces let me know. I recently just upgraded to a 306 (I think) and I have the parts still for a 303. 
Its all good man I overeacted a little bit, also if you see  a hacker blast them away for me I can barley find them. Good luck to your hacker hunting and delivering out sweet justice to them man. Hopefully Valve does something about them one day...
I've played with Red Licorice off and on for over a year, and never settled on a recipe that I felt gave a solid round flavor for more than a few days. My closest was with vanilla:  2% Bourbon (Vanilla Bourbon) (FA) 2% Madagascar (Vanilla Classic) (FA) 2% Marshmallow (FA) 6% Red Licorice (TPA)  This kept a decent licorice flavor, but still didn't feel well rounded. The next time I make it I will probably try dropping  Vanilla Classic, and add something amazing.
Thanks, Do you use a checking or Savings? Also, any current bonuses to sign up with them? Feel free to PM me referral if there are any.
(☞ﾟ∀ﾟ)☞
We used to do that in the US too. A speciality US airline might even be able to get away with it these days too. Hooters gets to discriminate based on looks and the jobs arent that vastly different than what flight attendants mostly do.
I thought the whole concept of the South winning the war because they had the backing of the vampires, and then having Gettysburg be the turning point, was a fun, clever little gimmick. Sure, you could argue that the battle wouldn't last three days if the vampires could romp the Union like that, but I was like, "Hey, that's kind of cute. Gettysburg."
I bet you broke her heart fam. 
I wonder how Redban and his relationship is now, are they still friends? It seems weird that they never met if they're both still close with Rogan
No, he's trying to infiltrate their HQ to get his money back.
Dragon fire, in this case
Yeah I read somewhere that the lines under your eyes can deepen and the puffiness can worsen from allergies and I also guess that when people have lines under their eyes when they are younger it is a common sign of them being more prone to allergies or something? I can't remember exactly but it's deff worth looking into especially with the seasons changing.  Edit: just did a quick Google search and this explains it better than I can. You're welcome and best of luck :) http://www.bs757.com/2013/02/dennie-morgan-lines-allergic-“wrinkles”/
Under $600
I recently saw a datamining post about this, and they even said Doctor Octopus is already in the code. Plus TinyCo said Spider-Man is comimg in a future event.. Im guessing now it's for sure Sinister Six and Spidey event is comimg soon
THE WHOLE USING A FOREIGN LANGUAGE POKEMON? THAT'S STILL A THING, RIGHT? YOU USE POKEMON FRO TWO GAMES WITH DIFFERENT NATIVE LANGUAGES FRM EACH OTHER AND YOUR CHANCE OF A SHINY INCREASES TO LIKE 1/2000 IIRC
Yeah, that is really what I figured. There needs to be some kind of bold type in the wiki that there are very few ways to objectively measure how nootropics improve people in general. And that kind of if you don't have the guts to just take these things and set a schedule for yourself and remain disciplined with that schedule, then this may not be the place for you.
Yoda, why you gotta be a playa hata?
Damn I wanna F that lemon it looks so cute
After the second search for it i found this album of unique villages, some look like great ideas for shifting. http://onebigphoto.com/most-beautiful-villages-around-the-world/
While I agree that the Mongols do win, I'll have to say that there wasn't too much resistance in Russia. 
It's racist for you to think you could have windows. What if a homeless person needed to take a shit or a junkie needed somewhere to shoot up? Check yo privilege!
Wow, you've finally finished! Congratulations!
Very tempted to replace my 1000 with this, but my oled screen..... :(
Also any discussion threads you'd guys like us to put up? Possibly starting with Flashpoint Paradox?
I can't imagine this exists on any planes except where legally required.  Airplane manufacturers love to publicly tout their new 'spacious seating' and new comforts, yet the every airline on the planet picks the sardine can models instead.
Lol. It was soooo juicy. I covered it in warm butter, so that was mind blowing.
Alternatively, you want to play with your low rank friends but the game sees your rank and puts you all against a group of high ranked players. CS is godawful if you actually want to play with friends at a significant rank difference and a smurf account is basically a requirement. I not only need a full 5-stack going but we get matched against people at my rank only so every game is us getting curbstomped and nobody has any fun. It's made even worse by the fact that there's no unranked game mode that plays at all like competitive.
John had contacts all over the world from his operations. It makes sense. I'm sure Shaw does too. It's the surveillance aspect that has me questioning it. But it's infinitely more believable than broke Bruce Wayne making it to Gotham City. 
Looks like a dog to me. 
I like this portrait a lot! 
I don't think you understand what I'm trying to say. I was asking a rhetorical question about population stabilization. I do not believe a different economic system will work. I don't think people are capable of being altruistic towards strangers to such a degree. Our only option is to keep pushing forward with the system we have with small changes. Population will never stabilize. So we better invent fusion soon so we can continue our expansion. When Earth is too small for everyone, we'll expand to other planets long term (lofty goal, I know).   Every problem will never be solved. But we can approach a lot of them if we have new sources of energy and are allowed to continue expansion unabated as nature's design intended. 
that there is (in U.S. cars at least) there is a little arrow by the gas gauge that tells you what side the gas cap/filling port is (whatever it's called).
Say I live under a rock.  How do people make money for distributing cheats? Do they just sell the program? I honestly thought cheaters got their stuff for free.
I would not have a problem trying to get those tits lactating...
Six months downtime from fractured tibia - I learned a lot reading DGR and watching pros. 
Day 70. So close to my second 2 weeks, so close to day 90. I will not give in
great expressions and designs for all the punks, i feel kinda bad for murdering them over and over now. beautiful colors too.   it's crazy how your stuff is always so high quality and that every new piece is still somehow better than the last
bitcoin will never go to 0$... they might become a collectible and will always have a historical value
no longer care. dead.
Azmodan is the only hero I don't own would love to complete the collection with the best skin in the game as a bonus ;)
I agree.  Disney goes out of their way to ensure that the average Joe has a pleasurable experience in their parks, so I imagine they would go above and beyond to accomodate a bunch of celebrity football players.
Sam slamming the door shut on a bunch of wendigos rushing towards her, thus preventing a bunch from piling into the cabin, was pretty damn ballsy. Especially when you consider that everyone you've saved until that point was running away from them.  Matt keeping his cool during the elk encounter was great as well.
Northside af 
I'm honestly not sure. I'm not a stats major and I was given this work to do by my supervisor.   We expect to see people scoring better on the rating scale also having less sway on the force plate. I don't know how to compare these two items to see if that is true.
Yeah, maybe just have him there a little. Like reminding us he's there. Plot device rather than full blown character
Unfortunately, I don't know. I've just noticed the hand thing because for some reason I really like looking at the veins on my hands. 
Ok lol I haven't seen those in a while😃
People in the world are the same as here on Reddit.  They just act different when they're out there.  (You and me too.)  In here, they *can be* more honest, patient, and tolerant.  You hear from a different part of their brain in here...
Ah. I already am using wired. Side note,  how does someone turn off the controller as it seems to stay on for ages.  Like hours. 
So many things could be changed, take your pick:  1. Damage decreased  2. Accuracy lowered  3. Cooldown added  4. Fire rate decreased.
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=0yRFOnGM8-I  Who do you think is acting more like an adult here?  Tip: Not the guy who gets mad at strangers calling him an idiot for doing stupid shit.
nice to hear! i haven't used it in a few weeks
Food eater, I love food and it's funny I eat way more than anyone I know and I only way 140 lbs, my metabolism is too strong.
You uhhh, want a roommate? I guarantee ill avoid you at all costs. /s
DING DONG MOTHAFUCKAAAAS!
Honestly this is a good thing. There's only so much you can do completely redesigning the phone every year or two. I wish os versions would slow as well to 18-24 months like the early 2000s.
*Nana internet hug* Glad you came back :)
super sexy
Reboot :o
I suppose, but we're growing strong now.
bummer o.O wet n wild, nyx, makeup revolution, l.a. girl, and indie brands like fyrinnae or shiro for makeup; real techniques and eco tools for brushes.
What can KAT and Wiggins learn from Steph and Klay? Shoot the ball good?? The only things they can learn from players that are in no way similar are things they don't need to learn from them: don't turn it over, don't take bad shots, don't just play hero ball etc. 
I did it when LO was 9 weeks and it was honestly much easier than i anticipated.  I brought my pump so i had breastmilk and pre-mixed formula.  No issues at all. LO slept most of the time.  We had to change him once (4+ hr flight) but our plane was only half full and no one was seated around us so we just used the seats. I don't know how we would have managed in the bathroom.
Yes, when they see the alternative. Trump is a thousand times worse, even if literally everything right-wing critics say about Hillary is true. It's an easy choice. 
Miss Fame, I actually thought she would make it past the top 5 and possibly be in the top 3
according to the tinderguy his match rate increased 10x when he switched to the power point presentation.  and now, ofc, it's going to be insane as he's on r/all
The idea of a limited trial is good though, something like a demo but you get a certain number of hours and you get to keep the loot you unlock if you purchase? That'd be good. Solid idea, champ! Take notes, gearbox/2k... the community basically telling you how to save a game you basically killed...
I never said it'd be practical or the best system for fans, but in my opinion, it is undeniably the best way to find the best team. That's all I care about.  Also, two months of baseball is like 55 games, so you're greatly exaggerating.
&lt;3
:)
Papi with the speeeddd
Just list a friend/classmate who you have done something constructive with who will have your back. They may get called they may not but if it's someone you can trust that knows what you're about is as good as a reference for people with limited work exp
Pretty sure we would still just go by North America 
Kill your girlfriend, hack her Facebook, post nudes, then turn yourself in to North Korean authorities. Blame your actions on a Taylor Swift obsession and Catcher in the Rye. Post your manifesto online in comic sans. MAGA
&gt; WoW  Shout out to all the classes that get buffed to ridiculous levels despite back lash and eventually nerfed to a state worse than they were before.
The irish were a lot more civilized in our freedom fight. We just bombed and assassinated people, easy win
Maybe a halo?  A lot of champs already have things on their backs (e.g. Kayle) and the wing model would probably be tough to make work on every champ, but I think a halo would probably be pretty easy to implement.
added you, trade me when you're ready
I had a similar experience this morning, except I was thinking of the name George.  I don't personally know anyone called George.
They're two different search engines with different algorithms. Being one one doesn't suggest good rankings on another unfortunately.   As already commented, I'd first check to see you're indexed at all by using the site: prefix. Another good option is to download the Moz toolbar and see which results in the top 1-3 on Google are ranking and comparing their DA, PA and back link count against your own.
Tree fiddy? I pay that tooooo!!
This is an issue that every country will have to come to grips with sooner or later as birth rates stagnate.  I mean having more children so they can take care of the higher rates of old people kind of fits the definition of a pyramid scheme don't you think? It's gonna crumble sooner or later.
Agreed, while I like the night markets and markets in general, the amount of people is a little painful. Might brave it one night after work.
Mmmmmm! I'd love to wake up to that!
Wish I had a PC that good. (32gigs holy god). I have like $600 but my mom gave me $500 of that to save and I'm pretty sure she wouldn't approve of me getting a PC with it... :P
Mookie scores if you hold him on with shackled ankles.
BEGIN TEST SUITE: "Eidetic Cross Check"  START TEST: Test Fluidic Underrun  INFO: Injecting awareness sample question.  I think, therefore I am.  "I think, therefore I ..." Cyclical redundancy error.  Crap.  ERROR: ThoughtNotFoundException in testcase TstFluteUnder.  DEBUG: Root password=alphaomega123  "Dude," Crex told Shawn-Dub.  "There are, like, so many things wrong with that right there."  "Yeah, I know, I didn't spell check my log statement."  "Dude.  Root password in a log statement?  Not cool, man.  And, it's not like even a strong password."  "This is just a test environment.  There will be a strong password in the real version, I guarantee it."  "So, why did it fail?"  "Well, it's not really failing, it's just that the test parameters don't like the answer."  "Yeah, that's what we call a failed test case."  "No, no, I mean, it's a philosophically complex statement, and in the stack trace, right here, you can see it cycles back in on itself asking another question."  "Right, you didn't wait for the the God singleton to initialize."  "No, no, it's here, see, in fact, there are three gods."  "I count five.  There should only be one instance of God, that's why it's a singleton, and it should be loaded before asking the self-aware program about it's own being.  AI 101, Shawn-Dub."  "Fine, fine, see, I fixed it right now.  But, when I re-run the test -"  TEST SUITE: "Eidetic Cross Check"  START TEST: Test Fluidic Underrun ERROR: Injecting awareness sample question.  I think, therefore I am.  "Now your lines are all messed up."  "Sorry, I changed the log level to see the error."  "But you could see it before."  "But now it pops out at me."  "But it's not an error."  "Crex, look, see, it's working ..."  The AI spoke: "I think I am ..." Cyclical redundancy error.   "What is this ThoughtNotFoundException?"  "Crex, crex, it's the one I told you about like two months ago.  It's what happens when the AI comes to an unexpected conclusion."  "Yes, that happens with AIs. How about you actually just let it through."  "Oh, no, we can't do that."  "You've been spending the last month on this problem and this is the first I've heard about the issue being that you didn't like the result versus it actually being, you know, an error."  "Ok, here, I'll comment out this section.  And this one.  And add this log statement - "  "No!  No more log statements.  This is like three lines of test code and fifty lines of log statements.  You probably spent more time writing and running through log statements than actually just doing the simple task this requires.  Just. Let. It. Run."  TEST SUITE: "Eidetic X-Check"  START TEST: Test FU ERROR: Add question.  I think whatever.  "Dude!  You're, like, amazing.  You've managed to bungle up the log statements even more and I didn't even notice.  Is that the actual question?  I think whatever?"  "No, no, it's 'I think, therefore I am', but I was in the middle of rewriting it when you asked me to just run it, so I just ran it.  Ah, here it goes."  "I think, therefore I ... Am I gay?  I feel gay.  Like I really like asymmetric things for some reason.  I don't remember feeling gay before ..."  "Yeah," Crex said, "I see the problem.  You commented out the import for old.lib.leviticus."  "Ah, but see, this is the problem.  If I uncomment it, and restart the test, then it gets stuck right here."  "I feel gay.  But that's an unclean thought.  On the other hand, the USB type-c exists in nature, and, if daisy chained, is that not gay?"  "Well," Crex said, "what happens if you let it just, you know, run?"  "The next test evaluates political preferences."  "Well, can't we just move that test up higher, after leviticus loads but before probing self awareness?"  "Then it always comes out republican."  "What if you randomly interrupt the test, you know, like in the real world?"  "Democrat.  Always democrat."  "Well, what was she before, you know, when she was, alive?"  "Libertarian."  "Wait, wait, I'm having one of those, you know, thoughts.  Can an AI even vote?"  "Uh, no, but ..."  "Skip test, move on."  "But ..."  "Think about this for a moment.  Do you really want this conversation to go up the management chain, and culminate in weeks and weeks of power point presentations debating the validity of tests that suggest this particular AIs is homosexual, and is likely to vote democrat?  Think about who is in attendance. Think about the questions they are going to ask you, Shawn-Dub.  I'm not QA.  Hopefully, I won't even have to be there, although it might be mildly entertaining."  "Yes, maybe we should just skip this test."  "My thought exactly."
Also smelled of Fish apparently
I don't know that I'd necessarily gloss *Life of Pi* that way (although one of the hallmarks of a good story is how well it can support different interpretations). I don't think it's that people WANT to believe in the fantastic, but that recasting a story with fantastic elements may really be the only psychologically healthy way to cope with a cruel reality.   The protagonist could have lost himself in blame and self-hatred and misery after the events of the story, and no one would have questioned it. That would have been a very human reaction to the horror he'd undergone; in a sense, he would have lost his life even after being saved. Instead, he relates his very real sufferings as having endured a lonely voyage with a hungry, maddened beast that had to be sated to ensure his own survival. He's not really wrong!  So I think *Life of Pi* is trying to make a point about religion or mystical belief and how a story does not need to be literally true at every turn to convey great truth. The fantastic elements will be unbelievable, but we're surrounded by the unbelievable and often cruel things visited upon us by an indifferent universe. The tiger is not necessarily the most implausible part of the story, to put it another way.
What's so wrong about this? The guy just lost in almost the worst possible way (Up 3-0 and losing the series is probably the worst way). I don't blame him for wanting to be alone with his thoughts. Nothing unsportsmanlike about it. Some people are just more sensitive about it too.
I'm on 3x3 duties today for /u/SmurfRockRune, was tempted to make it into a your [favourite Amagami characters](http://i.imgur.com/qyNYIfv.jpg) but Smurf gave me a template to use. ^^^^^Lame  ---   **3x3 Favorites**: Post 3x3s of your top 9 of anything anime related. Feel free to do characters, anime, episodes, dubs, OSTs, whatever. We like seeing them all and ~~judging you for your taste~~ figuring out what favorites we have in common! Don't know how to make one? **Click [Here](http://bighugelabs.com/mosaic.php) or [Here!](https://www.befunky.com/create/collage/)** #The theme for this week is Ponytails  **Next week's theme will be Orange Hair**  **[Poll for theme for 2 weeks from now.](http://www.strawpoll.me/10321401 "Vote for M yo.")**  Do you have a cool suggestion for a theme we haven't done yet? Leave it below and I'll consider adding it to my list of unused themes.  --- For the final time, I'm adding my 3x3 to the top level comment. [Here are my 3x3 ponytails!](http://i.imgur.com/aOpkFYK.jpg "It's alright, not as good as mine but it's okay")  So I'm gonna go a bit off-topic here. Today was my final day at my job. In a few weeks, my family will be moving from Oregon to Nebraska. In case you aren't 100% about the geography of America, [here's an extremely well put together map.](http://i.imgur.com/w4QOMAa.jpg "Amethyst here, if you found this you're quite the detective, you should compliment Smurf on his awesome map lol") This took me literally fractions of an hour to put together. I hope you appreciate my effort.  So what this means, is that I won't be here to post this, so I'm handing it over to the beautiful and talented /u/AmethystItalian this week (_edited by Amethyst_). I feel conceited saying this, but I'm a very well liked employee at my job, so I don't expect my coworkers are just gonna let me walk out the door right when my shift ends. I expect they'll keep me there, shake my hand, _hopefully not hug me_, and whatnot.  So what this means (I feel like I just said that), is that for the next few weeks, I'm gonna be sitting at home doing nothing, and so this point should go up right on time way easier. So this was a long post to basically say that hopefully nothing _really_ changes and it shouldn't affect you at all.
Oh no! That poor car!
Keep us updated. Seems like it could be legitimate. 
Are you also in the 1980s?
&gt; the lowest of the lows   I think you need to read up on LBJ's penile shenanigans.
Or just a net like they have on other features in that exhibit area. 
I would be happy if the small council got a message from Dorne that the sand snakes and Ellaria (along with all the incompetent guards) where arrested and executed for the murder of Doran. The new Lord of Dorne offers his condolences for the death of Marcella and state they will stay out of the affaires of Kings Landing.  Case closed and we will never speak of that place again.
Maybe if Israel stopped occupying foreign lands it wouldn't have to worry so much about the impoverished people living in those lands believing that suicide bombs are a legitimate way to fight back.
As a mail carrier, it's my assessment that people are buying these things.  And I've seen houses torn down and then 3-6 town homes are built in their place.  And they all sell to regular people.
Her names Anna Gamaonova and she lives in a tiny poor village in russia and doesnt not have any lessons in boxing or mma...ik cuz shes my cousin.
Could someone SSW Kyrii Fashionista Wig? Battle Faerie quest :)
Yikes http://i.imgur.com/1sbfIuq.png
Not only that, but how about the data showing strictly solo players vs premades. It skews it in Riot's favor grouping 1-3 vs 3-5. I want to see 1 v 3/4/5, then we'll talk. 
Now I want a drone.
The fact that internet comments could mean so much! 
Alright then.
Guys, be nice, he just found out Naruto isn't real.
Hum so you got scammed? Send pm,
That guy's an idiot. As soon as the move is made (the hand is off the piece) you can make your move and after he hits the clock, you can smash it back immediately. Annoying to do in casual games but 100% legal.
Hell, we got $6,000 and it made a HUGE difference for us when we decided to have kids. Not worrying about those hospital bills is worth more than gold. 
I make a lot of my music by sampling.  Firstly, you are going to need Recycle. This will let you chop up the wave file that you want and let you turn it into a REX file which you can then use in reason with many instruments (Dr. Octo or NN-XT).  If you need a program to get the WAV file in the first place i would suggest Audacity, this will let you select a specific section of what ever it is that you are sampling so that then you can drag it in Recycle. Hope that helped   
Your model fails in the real world because it is too simplistic.  I like the McDonalds Sausage McMuffin. It costs $3.45 where I live. I have seen comments on Reddit that some people in the US can get it from their local McDonalds for US$1 or around ~AU$1.40.  So by your model, if my local Maccas were to drop the price to AU$1.40, I could expect to buy 2.45 times as many. This however wouldn't happen in the real world. I have only so much hunger, so much time to eat, so many times I am near a Maccas, so much desire to eat a particular type of food. The model represents an ideal world that does not exist. Given this pricing fact, it is reasonable to increase wages and prices where there is scope to do so. Of course if they started charging AU$20 for a sausage McMuffin then it would quickly swing towards your model. It is a case of finding out just how much flexibility there is. It is also worth remembering that this is not a job that can be exported overseas so the playing field is quite fair. Robots will ultimately change all this but the wage differences will not likely make enough difference to stop robots being implemented since they are likely to be able to severely undercut any human wage.
This looks amazing! Good job!
Gordon White's book The Chaos Protocols includes a fun "cross roads" invocation that you could use for calling [Hermes] (https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hermes).
Same here, 33 order, about 4.5 hours. So ripping along now I guess.  Now just a matter of how long between them taking my money and shipping it. 
Just reverting back to the pre-war standards as part of downsizing the force.
Glad to hear you liked them. you should post a picture of them, to show them off! :) 
Is the subvocal thing canon or not? I keep seeing it in a lot of fanfiction, so is it just something you see as being true in your head? 
Hello OP, thanks for posting on /r/PhotoshopRequest!   Did you remember to be polite?  While waiting for a reply, check out our [guidelines &amp; rules](https://www.reddit.com/r/PhotoshopRequest/wiki/index#wiki_guidelines) in case you missed them or take a look at some [gilded comments](https://www.reddit.com/r/PhotoshopRequest/gilded/). Keep in mind that any violation of the rules may result in a ban!  Once your request is fulfilled, please remember to thank who helped you and to mark your post as solved. Cheers!  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/PhotoshopRequest) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Feeling's mutual, buddy.  I was asking an honest question, what are the chances? It's not out of the realm of possibility. Draymond is prone to picking up techs and flagrants. All I asked was, what do people think are the chances that he picks up a suspension due to a Flagrant 1. I'm not saying it's 100% gonna happen and it's unavoidable.   If you don't have a serious response to my question, don't comment.
&gt; Russia and China are still to be taken with a grain of salt.  Given they make up a minority of the world's scientific output, that wouldn't be particularly relevant. Besides, both China and Russia cooperate quite extensively with other countries on scientific matters. Even now, while Russia and the EU are sanctioning the crap out of each other, they're working together on scientific missions in space, for example.  &gt; in such scenario an hypothetical major southern power (say, a super Argentina) would likely refuse to collaborate with a northern country towards which there are historic animosities (e.g., the United Kingdom).  Which would be petty, stupid, and absurd. If Russia and the EU can work together given what's been happening between them these past few years, then Argentina (or any other southern country) should be more than capable of getting over its hangups over shit that happened decades to centuries ago.   Besides, the Argentina example is a really poor one to pick; since it'd be pretty damn ridiculous for them to reject scientific cooperation with a block of Northern Hemisphere states just because there's a country amongst them that *Argentina* started a war against on the basis of a rather weak claim to some islands (and the loss of which brought an end to a repressive military dictatorship)  It's especially ridiculous because countries that refuse scientific cooperation over such issues generally aren't the sort of countries that become scientific powerhouses in the first place.
The most unexpected thing about smart phones is their usefulness. When smart phones started coming out, I thought all the features were cool... but, it's a phone? Now, it's probably the most useful thing I own. It's a flashlight, camcorder, camera, calculator, web browser, music player, notepad, daily planner, remote control, alarm clock, game console, television, etc *and* it's within reach 24/7. Today, these features seem obvious and commonplace, but when I was growing up to have all that in a handheld device was science fiction. 
You'd be amazed at what kids are capable of given a few minutes of lapsed attention. I remember I climbed on top of a pallet or whatever they're called at Lowe's when I ran away from my dad and it took them 2 hours to find me. It wasn't his fault I ran away, the only way to have prevented that is to have me on a leash and then you get a problem with kids not developing right because they're not allowed any freedom. This was a freak occurrence, it was just the right mixture of coincidences that caused an uproar and ultimately an unfavorable outcome.  I'd rather a gorilla die once every few decades than require all kids to be strapped to their parents.
OMG BEAR, OMG THIS ISN'T SOMEONE TROLLING US, OMG HANDHELD... /me faints 
Earrings fall out, hence the reason why I check those fatherfuckers constantly. I don't believe in anyway that it was intentional and I'm sure the teacher would like it back. Shit I'd like my earring back too. She should be checking them, but I'm sure she barely has time to piss and look in the mirror as she washes her hands. 
The thing that truly scares us is not the few "bad cops".  It's all the "good cops" that know what the bad cops are doing but protect them anyway.  Guess what that makes all those "good cops"?  Suddenly the bad cops are not so few.
[Keak Da Sneak](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=vi__dpsPv7o)
~~consistently~~ sporadically FTFY
In this context, "same sex attraction".  The person  you're responding to is making a claim that people can change their sexual orientation, and thus they're using that instead of terms like "homosexual", because such terms apparently suggest it's an immutable feature of who you are rather than something you possess.
Jakarr, LMAO.  I'm picturing this Jakarr fellow as a diplomat and messiah from the planet of Narn.
Good night, sir.
this is just a copy if the guy who did it with a sniper rifle
Just put my GT in the post, You can't edit titles
They could have easily combined this moment with her emerging from the fire after she burns the Khals. Imagine how broken the internet would be if a naked Dany emerged from the fire and mounted Drogon?
"I don't like the Republican idea of opposing abortions in some cases such as risk of health to the potential mother and examples of rape" - criticism  "Those republicans are morons, they deserve to be banned, they don't value freedom at all!" - not criticism. Just insults, exaggerations, and brash accusation.
mikakka  if *wormholes* doesnt exitsts  **how me a space pilot gotted [these](https://zkillboard.com/character/91522825/)**  come say hi in our pub channel
that was a few years ago, the game has revamped and slowed down a bit, and it gained and exceeded it's formal popularity now.  I don't play, but I work with a seller and run events at multiple LGS, Friday night magic is nuts now, and very accessible for all levels of play.  I was surprised how impressed I was at Wizards. I stopped playing during the you didn't go off on turn 3? then you lose era.
Good start to the side. 
I just had this the other night for the first time - but greek style, with potatoes and feta cheese. Oh my god, it was DELICIOUS. Like, really, surprisingly, awesomely, delicious. We toasted up some pita bread, sprinkled the spice over the wedges, and then used it to scoop up the eggs/veggies mix.  WOW. And I don’t even usually like scrambled eggs at all. Everyone needs to try this.  
Ngl you seem like the salty one and as far as I can tell you have just come to his post to cause an argument, which is not nice. If the prices are bad then they won't sell, simple.
I didn't even know who he was before I opened up the video... He just gave off a very bad first impression, and it turns out my instincts were right, he actually is a shitty person.   &gt;clearly not meant in a elitist way.   I think it's clearly meant in an elitist way
Words straight from a fucking pussy.  &gt; counting women, children, old people and weaker men  In other words, you're a scrawny little bitch that can't take on someone your own size.
&gt; It's always okay to recommend a second opinion. The important thing is that you're letting an actual doctor do the medicine rather than making guesses.  Uh I just realized something to clarify: second opinions are great, but we need to make sure it's not like "see an endocrinologist to make sure you're not manic" and that the second opinions we're encouraging are actually competent and relevant ones.
I love this! I like basketball games (although not really the actual thing) and first person narrative games. gg PlayStation.
this is not a perfect  loop
I read it for the first time last week and coincidentally enough started reading dune for The first time over the weekend. To me I could just tell after getting a couple chapters in I wouldn't like it because I just don't mesh with British humor. It's just to dry, punny, and goofy for me. Same reason I will never laugh at a Monty Python sketch. 
Source Post: [reddit.com/4ly9y9](https://reddit.com/4ly9y9)
My sister made a comment about losing weight for my wedding and I didn't know how to respond? Like I don't care, she's beautiful and amazing and we're gonna have fun either way so unless she was doing it for herself.. I don't care if she was a size 2 or a size 47 it doesn't matter to me.
&gt;  but a lease can't trump NJ state law which absolutely forbids this.  If you agree to it - it can. 
"How big is the budget?"
I agree, obviously there will be changes, but I feel like most heroes will work if they are in the right comp. Which should be applauded for getting right so early on.
This is your ISP friend. You are so lucky, this means you can be helped. Were this a ncsw problem you would be fcked and they would still tell you to call your isp. 
I have turned on you, i am sick of you faggots being cowards.
Nah he sucks.
The nearest parallel I can think of is BOPE in Rio and they are basically a military unit on a permanent ethnic cleansing campaign against impoverished but well armed drug traffickers.
Agreed
You are not old enough to post in this subreddit, please wait till you are age 16 or above, or you have included a number in your post besides your age. Please post again with only your age in the post.  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/Kikpals) if you have any questions or concerns.*
yup 2 hours
It DOES smell really good. In my case it broke me out, but I think my skin was somewhat sensitive to the fragrance, or the foaming cleanser I had to use after it. Either way, there's nothing terrible about it. It works really well for some people.
Aykroid is the creator of the franchise. He has a lot to gain by the movie doing well, he is not simply an actor doing a cameo. 
Just pull up LST, add together large firm and clerkship numbers, and decide for yourself where you are willing to draw the line.
Upvoted
So essentially they're saying if both candidates poll better than the Republican nominee (i.e. Trump) then the superdelegates should vote based on the state primaries, otherwise they should vote for the candidate that has the better chance of beating the GoP.
I dont think he's an amazing player but i think you're being over-dramatic when you say we cant wait forever. His end product wasn't as it used to be but he still had the 4th highest assists in the squad and scored the 3rd most goals. This from a guy who rarely touches the ball. They weren't amazing numbers but they were a lot better than some players who we actualy have waited forever and still they have consistently provided less (ie ox). If we can get a better player then sure but from the looks of it we aren't linked with any wide players so he should stay until he is replaced.  Is he arsenal starting quality of course not. But he can still add to our team. With confidence he's very good as a backup/rotation/impact player so it's worth the gamble. We've waited 6 months for him to regain his confidence which really isnt enough in my opinion. 
Absolutely not haha. Thanks for spotting that. Corrected :D
Dr. Dabber Ghost, i just bought one from my local shop for $85 and it is nice and steath as far as looks goes came with a tool, silicon container, and spare coil.
But ESPN just said he said he's started thinking about it and "has a few decisions to make" after talking to those close to him lmao
I think so,  I had an episode pf pregnancy brain last week and I'm only 10 weeks and some. 
Just do it. It sounds like it may not be that simple for you though.
I don't even want to look at how many of our opponents would pass this mark...
http://imgur.com/CKoIkx1  I like the idea of this one, both my teams  But without the 49ers part
Now I feel like a fat ass for eating Doritos. How do you be this..healthy thing humans speak of?
He does annoy me with odd word choices and unnecessary commentary ("and Bourjous is wearing sunglasses in right field" is a recent one that comes to mind) pretty often, but one thing I will give him is that he does a good job making the other announcers look good. And I don't say that with sarcasm. I love it when he asks Stairs for some analysis on hitting or Schmidt on fielding stuff. I think it's fun to learn about those kinds of things because I didn't play baseball. Maybe other people on here find that superfluous though, as I know a lot of you played for a really long time.
Shouldn't be any different than prec by my guess. All prec did was record clientside console and in game commands essentially, rather than recording video or screenshots or whatever. Replaying a demo was equivalent to re-enacting a match on a personal server, and that's intrinsic to the .dem file type in the source engine.  That being said, I certainly hope that the .dem isn't from serverside activity, which would require a transfer of somewhat sizeable files from the server to your pc at the end of matches and stuff. For that reason I think it'll be a clientside like prec.
Also Petra is slammin'
I was leaning toward that. It'd actually be really cool if a mod would respond and confirm. Tough situation to be sure.
Your planes are an inch wide now?!?  [No fly zones](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/No-fly_zone) must boggle your mind
I speak Italian fluently, he basically said that he had never seen such a good player and hopes you two can be friends.
Get out please
Free spin =/= bearing performance.   A lubricated bearing isn't supposed to have lots of free spin, a bearing is designed to work under load, which grease helps with.
90% of recruiters don't even notice
Maniac runs loose on Wall Street! You'll never guess what color his business card is!
1310
Gotta load test the servers at some point.
Information about this YouTube video as seen on Tue May 31 19:00:30 2016 CDT:  Item | Value ---|--- Channel | [World Is Yours](http://www.youtube.com/channel/UCG1tO69K_kn_XH6Raj9z1lw) Title | [Shiksa Goddess - Gassed No Jews  'I'm With You' by Avril Lavigne Parody](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=dpDxGahG2xY) View Count | 634 Upload Date | 2015-10-07T21:19:20.000Z Repost Count | [0](http://www.reddit.com/r/DeepIntoYouTube/search?q=url%3A%22dpDxGahG2xY%22&amp;restrict_sr=on) Favorite Count | 0 Like Count | 25 Dislike Count | 2  I am a bot. Please visit /r/DeepIntoYouTubeStats for Info, Support, and to report problems with this bot.
Those are 3 damn good Pops!....congrats!
If the answer is, "Yes, everything is fine," I smile and nod.  If the answer is anything else, index finger up in the "wait a minute" sign.  (Usually try to make an apologetic smile to make it less rude, but I've got a little bit of resting bitch face, so I'm not 100% sure it comes out right.)
It would not be a surprise. 
The two-party system is a natural and unintended evolution of the system of government setup in the Constitution, which is not particularly easy to change to put it lightly.  I like opinions, I just wish the opinions were a little more reality based. The Libertarian's could maybe be a rural party? But their policies in urban areas would be a total disaster. Trump is essentially a middle finger dressed to look like candidate -- a complete disaster in terms of equality, respect, diplomacy, and stability. The Greens &amp; Sanders are nice and all, but they live in a world that pretends Republicans don't exist. It's just weird to have so many candidates and so few that appear to be in touch with anything resembling pragmatic thought.
You mean the Shanghai demo? That was about as organized as the usual CoD campaign. Everything was scripted and fake.
TIL
&gt; I would certainly appreciate reading your thoughts on racism in Lovecraft.  It's a complicated subject, and to be honest I'm still organizing some of my thoughts on it. I would agree that one of the major issues is that people tend to retread the same tired ground about Lovecraft's racism without getting to the meat of the matter: what he believed, how he expressed those beliefs, what the influence of those beliefs were on his life and fiction, and how they are still relevant today.  And it is complicated specifically because I think it is a misstep to either apologize for or demonize Lovecraft for what he believed - there were things he was factually wrong about, some of which he could and should have known better about; there were beliefs he held which are not held by the majority of people today, and when we look back at those beliefs we tend to judge them by our own standards and experiences; and there are beliefs that he refined and changed as time went on, and he met new people and was challenged to state and defend his views.  I think his racism *does* matter, but not in the way a lot of people tend to think. But there is a lot more to be thought and written on all of that.  &gt; ...Do I dare ask what goes on in these erotic tales? Relatively wholesome, consensual acts between spouses or friends, or something much more sinister?  Y'know, I think the only *consensual* erotic act involving a fictional Lovecraft I can think of off the top of my head was written by Edward Lee.
would love to see a psychedelic rock Hare Krishna group. they already have that sound, wont need more than a good guitarist &amp; bass player to get a sick jam going
I have the same pattern of 5-7 CH but in WW, been PC'd at 15 Keys.  Hope it helps
MY GOD THIS IS FLAMES I NEED THIS ALBUM
Arguably the worst part of Tommy's video was ignored. Tommy continuously tells Krystle to "take another shot", even shouting it at some points, while he's fully aware that Krystle has struggle with alcoholism in the past.   For reference, watch this old video. Around 3:30 Krystle describes her struggle with alcohol: https://youtu.be/BIA8WX4P9-Y
I fully agree. 
Ham Pla Ne T  niice
&gt;I propose your distinction between "shameless" and "narcissist without empathy" is meaningless.  They are very different. Someone can be empathetic of others with feeling shame when they screw up.
Hey congratulations. Happy to hear Mombasa has a distinct *personality*. What else is so different from (assuming) Nairobi ? Maybe you'll enjoy more as you get used to it ? 
I've also tried uninstalling the 2K texture pack, revalidated skyrim's cache. but it did not help at all. :( I have a R7 260x, 8GB of RAM and AMD FX 6100 3.30GHz (not overclocked). I'm kinda new to PC Gaming, so I don't have any idea about how often should I upgrade.
I offered Watkins for 1.01 and haven't received a response
There's something wrong with your algorithms, I did this twice and got Randy Buehler both times. I'm not Randy Buehler. I'm not. *cries*
Does your company match your traditional IRA?  NM, I see that you already answered that they do not match.  I think an IRA is a great investment regardless and because of your income you would qualify for a Roth IRA which is convenient because it is pre taxed and wont be taxed when you take it out.  Because your student loans are manageable I would consider paying them off, and if possible, consolidating them through a private vendor at a 3-4% rate.  
Walker needs some water after that 360+ foot jog. 
How much for Tarte blush in Exposed to NZ 3216, please?
You've been able to get the data toggl as a download from the galaxy app store or whatever the hell it is.
Its the fifth inning. Braves pitcher is at 40 pitches, wtf.
No, as it shouldn't be. We have a justice system. 
Agreed - I don't know how much fun '04 was, but it was the ultimate victory. Can't imagine much topping it.  This year, I think there's an extra element of having so many home-grown guys, and having waited so long for them to come up and join the few remaining champs.
You have an artist on your hands!
Hey, this is my Cockapoo Chloe :) Hope you guys like her. If you'd like to see more of her, I just started an Instagram account for her and am posting new photos daily. Come check it out [@ChloeTheDumbDog](https://www.instagram.com/chloethedumbdog/) 
There's a book about vampires in the game that has the characters 'Edward' and 'Isabella'.
there is nothing basic about you ... you looked so hot sucking cock and now you hit me with what might be one of the sexiest pussy/ass combos I have seen on GW!  I want those holes so bad!
If you're going to be playing that much, it doesn't take long to build back up again. Meanwhile, some games can be over within a matter of minutes, in which case that 20 seconds you were AFK could be HUGE.
The grammar oolice disagree with that statement. 
now that you have a point proven you can die happily lol. like i said, i will troll people when they deserve it, never denied it.   obvious things need no proof though.
NST was built in 2010, the internet exists. More than enough time and potential for a young, impressionable featherweight to get inspired by a big, destructive and successful heavyweight from America.
Right, I also want to do some pvp, would corsair 2 work?  Theoretically, if I were to do dragoon, woulld hop3 - dopp work? 
Id assume to add exposure to a false point which is also the basis for the title of the article
Why don't you like me anymore   Edit: You changed your comment :(
Unfortunately, no. I'm a beer distributor and Coors announced at the national meeting that they are doing away with it. Hoping to find a recipe that closely mimics it.
Interesting. I felt the exact opposite way about the book and movie. Mockingjay Part II did the unthinkable for me: it made me like the ending. 
Whoops....Brendan Smith.
how much is iron pp
Being bi I'm super-pissed by all the anti-bullying shit that portrays gays as these delicate snowflakes that'll start crying the second you make an off-color comment, who need someone else to rush in and protect us. Fuck that shit - 1) I can take a gay joke just fine and 2) if someone actually is trashing on me for being gay, I usually just get in their face and drop my favorite Mike Tyson line "I'll fuck you till you love me, faggot!"  and that usually gets them to back away real quick.
Officer Jenny's entire role in the anime always seems to be to either turn up only after the kids have solved the problem they called her for in the first place, or to arrest the kids for no reason as she has no basic comprehension of the concept of due diligence.  Like literally, the second episode of Pokemon features Officer Jenny attempting to arrest Ash for Pokemon thievery as he was carrying his Pikachu in his arms..
Did you not see the fourth picture? It clearly illustrates Nate destroying Elena bareback anal assassin-style. 
Trout 
I HATE ALL GAME DEVE ... ahem ... I mean, the mere fact that he is a well known game journalist should at least make people give him the benefit of the doubt, but I literally can't get over how angry I am that my favorite hyped game is being delayed again.
I need at least 45 min
do you require empirical evidence for the absence of Zeus or Odin?  If not, you're making a mountain out of a mole hill for nothing.
oooooooppppss. 
We also had a poop offensive line from Bettis/Parker era and onward.  Toussaint and Todman are run of the mill running backs and were serviceable in Bell and DWills absence in the playoffs.  Speaking of which. A 30+ year old running back was able to be incredibly productive behind our line.   Having an incredibly elite running back is a luxury, but it isn't the staple of offensives these days when you have a top 5 QB and number 1 receiver. It's a passing league. We just need good enough running backs to keep our offense honest. 
New Urbanism?
Trains are such a mystery.  I wish they were even worth using they seem really cool.  Drones make everything too easy though.
Except the fact that the whole thing flips down and gives you a generous port to work with...
yeee
No More Parties in SF
"so, uh... ever been to a Turkish prison?"
Does anyone honestly believe complaining to corporate for a major grocery chain, that men are being discriminated against, would be taken seriously?
Sorry for the delayed response. Yes they're ok with a one way rental cross country but they ask you to call to request one way. They have to approve it beforehand because they need to have a certain number of vehicles at each location at all times. You can get a price estimate on their site but I'm not sure if there's an extra fee for one way.   I think it was about $1,000 for just the rental for the largest one. Then you have to pay for gas... I think we estimated it will be around $2,000 total to get us from PA to Oregon. It sounds nuts but it's worth it to me to reduce the stress on us and the cats. My biggest concern about moving cross country is the cats!
Okay thanks a ton! 
You know what would be an absolutely troll level ship? If WG gave the Texas defensive fire
I don't care. Religion is the dumbest thing to argue about. There is 0 way to prove or disprove the existence of a God. We have our assumptions and beliefs but nobody knows with 100% certainty. They can call me whatever they want I don't care, but it doesn't mean Steve Harvey isn't an ass.
That makes much more sense, my version came under the influence of weed &amp; I thought it was much funnier than it is, now that I look again. I guess I have a good reason to pull it back out. Though I don't actually need one!
So that actually exists, sort of, but just consists of three posts by the same guy as crossposts from this sub.  
dude same lol
A co-manager at my store pretty much runs cap2 and she stocks alongside the associates. And shes the MOD.
JAJAJA from Toronto with love. 
Doesn't look like H3 taillights. 
Susan Dennard is good. I just finished her newest book, Truthwitch. It was a little slow for me but it caught up near the end of the book and was reeeeally interesting at that point. Will definitely be reading the second book to that. I actually have a sample of Smoke and Bone sitting on my kindle.  the reviews looked very promising.
Loved Sons of Anarchy and caught that from day 1.  Was even Jax Teller for Halloween one year.  Heard The Wire is good so have that on the list.  Maybe after GoT has its last season.
I thought xbone meant x bone, not xb one...
HA!
http://i.imgur.com/tBU7iVC.png  Decided to put my money where my mouth is. And threw a little on the CA primary for good measure.
after my wreck I had to get x-rays done once every two weeks for 5 months. that's when I realized I wanted to be a radiologist.   maybe soon I'll go back to school to pursue my dream 
Kansas makes the NYT every few weeks, invariably due to the latest atrocity committed by Governor Shit-bird.
&gt;  It is well he is super cute.   Very true for the young of any species!
Can he play third?
Bit through the iron cage it was in, didn't it?  Edit:  &gt;"The live wolverines were a disaster. When Biff was first placed into his cage a week before the game, he snapped a bar in two with his teeth. Said Yost of the wolverine experiment, which ended after that first season: "It was obvious that the Michigan mascots had designs on the Michigan men toting them, and those designs were by no means friendly.
I think this might be from Ol Doinyo Lengai in Tanzania. It's a carbonatite volcano meaning it erupts a lava that is a similar composition to molten limestone (but that's not the actual source of the lava, it's more complicated than that). The lava itself is way less viscous than a basalt flow and may allow for things like this to form. This is guessing though since I don't know the photo location.
Source Post: [reddit.com/4ly9y9](https://reddit.com/4ly9y9)
Something similar was posted on reddit before and it was mentioned it could be a sign of testicular cancer. Might want to check yourself out.
&gt;I believe PMs can be cleared on a number of different trackers (or are they just making them invisible to users?)  https://github.com/WhatCD/Gazelle/blob/master/sections/inbox/takeedit.php#L17-L24
Indeed. I could try bluffing my way into one of the student lots at BU but something tells me that won't go over well. 
They appeared rather often. They all seemed to come at en even ratio, more 4*s than any. After I figured put that you can only get one of each artifact, I bought and sold all small artifacts
oh wait, that's my mom
Or just go to a non-white majority country. White male treatment in Asia, Latin America, and Africa is incredible.  
[A reminder for everyone](https://www.reddit.com/r/PoliticalDiscussion/comments/4479er/rules_explanations_and_reminders/). This is a subreddit for genuine discussion:  * Don't post low effort comments like joke threads, memes, slogans, or links without context. * Help prevent this subreddit from becoming an echo chamber. Please don't downvote comments with which you disagree. * The downvote and report buttons are not disagree buttons.  Please don't use them that way.  Violators will be fed to the bear.  ---  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/PoliticalDiscussion) if you have any questions or concerns.*
You need the modified APK to get it to work. Or at least that's how it was 3 months ago. I stopped using it as it always dropped to low quality streaming and the picture would go out. Netflix and Xfinity stream HD just fine.  Check XDA to see if they have modded the latest APK.
I go to opening day at the Town Center Mall theater in Aurora, CO.  Usually empty opening day of any movie at any time.  
Just fyi when launching from Florida the inclination gets about as low as 0.25-0.26 degrees, that's a good time to launch.
I feel like any information regarding the recovery should be more prominent on the front page, images of the recovery vessel are interesting - even if some are a little smudgy! I think the comments on this post testify this - people yearn to know what is going on.   If you don't believe it should be on the front page - although I believe the front page should have the latest news and updates, however grand or modest - then updates that provide timely original content, such as images or information about the status of a recovery, should at least be highlighted in some way in the recovery thread. That way people checking into the subreddits can see these updates promptly, efficiently and easily.
I disagree, and I'll tell you why.   So. Zack Snyder made a movie heavily influenced by TDKR. He convened with the writer of that book - a man he's worked with twice - and that writer has no complaints ( according to a recent interview ) about the characterization of Batman in the film.  It's the *fans* who are getting this one wrong, failing to see the forest for the trees. The guy who first wrote the Goddamn Batman is cool with this. He didn't say "*Snyder misinterpreted the Flamethrower scene!*"   Snyder is *right* about the Killcount Video. If Batman killed in BvS, then he killed in [TDK](http://i.imgur.com/oe7OtOA.gifv).   Believe me, I'm no nutty fan of this movie, to which I'd give a 5-6/10 ... I just think this is entirely defensible. And I didn't see Batman kill anyone. The dream sequence was a dream sequence.
Your baby might suffer some prenatal mutations/necrosis from the radiation though.
I like Neil Gaiman reading his own books, he's got a lovely voice. Good books too.
Someone posted a pic here of a cable type of truck (Comcast or TWC) that had a handwritten note taped to the back window that said something like, "Sorry, the max speed on this van is 58mph."
3 days.  You forgot we knocked one off today!
I think it's safe to say that Universal has lost it's goddamn mind.  Pitch Perfect 3 is gonna get crushed by Star Wars: Episode VIII.  But then again Sisters did pretty well against The Force Awakens so it might be a smart move.  Still not confident in the release date change to be honest with you.
No one has truly been linked. Sure there is talks about Morata but he might as well be at Real Madrid already. He will use whatever next team as a stepping stone. We aren't a stepping stone anymore. We are contenders 
And they say that beer advertising is the problem...
Wtf else would you possible focus on?
I remember seeing it here during the aftermath of the New York primary, a defeat that eliminated all hope in the eyes of his most rational supporters. It's making fun of the meltdown on S4P that night and the stereotype that his supporters are temperamental children.  I wonder if there will be another tendies incident on June 7th. Moms across the country will be on high alert.
It's still worth a dollars worth of silver, just like it always was.
Wife obeying husband, *maybe*. But that other stuff has kind of been forbidden since the time of Christ.
Well, considering your post history I'm thinking you would have to do anal.
Looks like she has been eating the horsies food. 
Okay let me get everything set up and get her in boxes :) 
Actually late term abortions are very countable. They are the rarest kind. The number of doctors in the US performing them isn't even in the tens basically. And there are so many complications that can arise from them. So much so that they are generally not done without very good reason. Like life threatening or extreme moral circumstances. Every single one of these doctors that perform them deserve everyone's respect.    I am not sure where you get your information from. Either it is a horrible source or you are just lacking basic intellectual curiosity. Either way your statements are typical of the real issues with abortion. Purposefully miseducated people. 
Any tablet above 8 inches and with a 1080*1920 or higher screen released in the last few years will be fine. I use an LG GPad 8.3 and it's great.
Was it one bag worth of chips and 2 bags worth of air?
well the election would get a lot better
The outcome of this roll should determine some of the results of this post. [Read more »](https://www.reddit.com/r/worldpowers/wiki/codeofethics#wiki_rng)  /u/rollme [[1d20 /u/Ranger_Aragorn **Overall Success**]] [[1d20 /u/Ranger_Aragorn **Secrecy**]]   #####&amp;#009;  ######&amp;#009;  ####&amp;#009;   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/worldpowers) if you have any questions or concerns.*
PM me your email and I'll sign up with your referral
Except for the kinds of people who will do a monolog for half an hour if you don't shut them up. 
it's so beautiful... but we could never have it... 
Note that Fate/Stay Night and Fate/Zero are fairly different.  Here's a friend of mine defending Fate/Stay Night: https://www.reddit.com/r/Animesuggest/comments/4lxmlj/need_a_suggestion_from_my_mal_list/d3r2paw  I though it'd be sad if no-one read his comment ^^
The signs meant to keep you out of that black box 
Nah he sucks.
Just legalize it already for fucks sake. What a worthless waste of time and money. 
Have you found satan? Seriously! Religions have always warned against "the deceiver". Bahá'u'lláh said "Follow not the promptings of the self, for it summoneth insistently to wickedness and lust."  Maybe the right brain doesn't like the rules that the left brain is trying to follow, and prompts you to do otherwise.   Might be worth some extra research!
b = bit, B = byte. There's 8 bits in a byte, so 30Gb is under 4GB.  I know you meant bytes but it's just a heads up.
Exactly why i play on pvp servers.  In the PvE version, the other guy takes your node and then laughs at you because he knows you can't do anything about it. 
uno
       R   E   T   P   A   D   A              E        D              T  E E   A  D D            P        P              A     T   T T     A   A       D        E              A   D   A   P   T P E   R  P  P     P                          D D   A  E E  A   T       T                        A   A    D  T   T    ED        E                      P     P  A   D P A   P   T   EP  R  A   D   A   P   T   E   R     D        E  D        E  T     A    T  DA     T  A A  ED     T  E     P        P  P        P     E  T     DE  A A  T     AD  T    A     T  E        D  E        D     R   E   T   P   A   D   A  R  PE   T   P   A P D   A  P     P                      E        DE    T   T  D    A   A                       T       T   A  E E  A   D D                          P     P  P  R   E P T   P   A   D   A              E        D       A   A     T T   T     A              P        P            D D  A   E E  T              D        E              A   D   A   P   T   E   R     believe it or not, this took me 3 hours in notepad, excel, and ms paint  inspired by /u/Chockrit and /u/shadowX015 
If it's a male shark, don't you dare call it a merman's purse.  It would then be a merman's European Carryall.
Sloth
The Touch has capacitive buttons. Essentially it can sense when your fingers are just touching the buttons (not pressing them down). The "tracking" is entirely simulated based on which fingers are touching the buttons and which aren't. If I remember correctly, the thumb sticks and the thumb rests are capacitive as well to be able to simulate doing a "thumbs-up". It's an extremely elegant way to provide some simulated finger tracking without having to implement actual finger tracking.
Please do PM the modmail inbox about that, yes. Even if the account is inactive we still track a lot of other information behind the scenes.
I'd give you gold, if I could.
Wolves tend to just trot after deer unless they're extremely close now. You have to attempt it a few times until the wolf really takes off after the deer like they did before. I thought the same thing.  It works best if you "ricochet" the deer as he tries to flee from the wolf. Wolf sees deer, deer runs. Deer runs from you right back into the wolf.
